First comes the immutably loud chime. Then the bright welcome message illuminates the screen. And these days, the inevitable ad is for the new Tom Hanks film, filling the back seat with the movie’s thumping score.For nearly a decade, the Taxi TV has intrigued and amused, but mostly annoyed, New Yorkers, disrupting the start of what should be a respite from the outside world with an inescapable incursion of sounds and sights. Along with subway delays and bridge tolls, the screens might top the list of city transportation complaints.But the monitors, which double as credit card payment consoles, could soon be muted for good.The city’s Taxi and Limousine Commission plans to vote Thursday on a pilot program that would remove the Taxi TV from some cabs and replace it with more modern — and less intrusive — technology. One possibility may be that taxi drivers hand passengers a smartphone or a tablet with a credit card reader to collect the fare.The program would for now be limited to 4,000 vehicles out of about 13,500 yellow taxis, but officials say the goal is to eventually retire the Taxi TV altogether. The commission said the repetitive programming and balky mute and power buttons have led to lots of complaints from passengers and drivers alike, and may account for people abandoning yellow cabs for Uber and other services.“It repeats itself constantly, and it’s just noise for no purpose,” Karen Hrycyna, 55, of North Brunswick, N.J., said on Tuesday morning as she waited for a taxi outside Pennsylvania Station.Largely a mix of movie reviews and advertisements for Broadway shows, some taxi clips have been more memorable than others. Cat Greenleaf’s celebrity sit-downs on her townhouse steps on “Talk Stoop” became a staple. But a video starring David S. Yassky, then the taxi commissioner, cheerily telling riders about a new model of taxi was panned because riders could not turn it off or mute it.Taxi officials have long debated how to improve the screens. A survey in 2011 found that riders thought the screens were nearly the worst part of a taxi ride, second only to the high fare. Of the 22,000 riders surveyed, 31 percent said the screens were their least favorite part of the taxi experience.Despite such sentiments, some riders say they like them. As she stepped out of a taxi at Penn Station, Alyse Lorenzo, 28, of Queens, said she liked Alex Trebek’s “Jeopardy” trivia clips that run in taxis.“I wouldn’t be distraught if they took them out,” she said. “But if you’re by yourself, it’s nice to have something to look at on your drive.”And last year, one of the taxi screens helped Mayor Bill de Blasio find a renter for his townhouse in Brooklyn when his family moved to Gracie Mansion — the tenants said they learned of the listing from a news report on Taxi TV.The current taxi commissioner, Meera Joshi, said the pilot program was an opportunity to try out more modern technology.“It is definitely something that over time could probably, and does, get irritating for our frequent taxi riders, and most certainly for our drivers,” Ms. Joshi said. “I think it feels somewhat dated today when you’re in the taxi.”Ms. Joshi declined to say whether she muted or turned off the screen when she rides in a taxi.If the pilot program is approved, the Taxi TVs will not be removed overnight. The commission will make sure the shift is a “deliberate process” and the new payment system is secure and accurate, Ms. Joshi saidMichael Woloz, a spokesman for Creative Mobile Technologies, one of two companies that provide the screens and other equipment for New York City taxis, pushed back against the notion that riders do not like the monitors. Many passengers, he said, find the news and weather updates useful.“It shouldn’t be shocking to people that a high percentage of taxi passengers actually watch the content and don’t mind it,” Mr. Woloz said.Some taxi drivers have opposed the screens since they were first discussed in 2003 and began to be widely implemented in 2007.On Tuesday outside Haandi, a popular restaurant for taxi drivers in Manhattan, Abul Hossain, 51, said customers do not like the noise.“I think 99 percent of them keep it off,” said Mr. Hossain, who said he had driven a taxi for about 25 years.Bhairavi Desai, the executive director of the New York Taxi Workers Alliance, said the mood among drivers over the change was “utter elation.”“The T.L.C. is eight years late in reversing a horrible decision,” she said, “but we’re glad the time has finally come.”Indeed, times have changed. In the age of ubiquitous smartphones, the taxi monitor is one screen too many, said Ryan Levine, 29, a musician who was walking past Stuyvesant Square in Manhattan on Tuesday.“Being in a taxi in New York is like a small escape,” he said. “You’re treating yourself. It’s not the subway. And so I don’t want to be getting blasted with a TV.”More than 15 million people tuned in to CNN to watch the Democratic presidential candidates’ debate on Tuesday night, according to Nielsen ratings data provided by the network.The audience for the debate was nearly two-thirds the size of the two earlier Republican presidential debates, but it was the highest rating ever for a Democratic presidential primary debate — signaling continued interest in the 2016 race.The previous record for a Democratic presidential debate was set by the 2008 debate in Philadelphia, which averaged 10.7 million viewers for ABC. Tuesday’s debate in Las Vegas, which was moderated by Anderson Cooper, averaged 15.3 million total viewers.CNN also streamed the debate on its website, CNN.com, mobile apps and Apple TV, where usage peaked at 980,000 concurrent streams at 10:20 p.m. That beat the network’s live stream of the Republican debate last month, which, at its peak, had 921,000 streams viewed at one time.The viewership for the Republican debates was slightly less than 24 million on Fox News in August and nearly 23 million on CNN last month.It is time to celebrate the wonders of our captains of industry — those who innovate and make the world a better place.At least, they are making it a better place for themselves. At least for a while. And even if their innovations sometimes leave me wondering what they were really thinking.I am speaking of innovative companies like Volkswagen. Its decision to use software to cheat on emissions tests shows just the kind of bold, out-of-the-box thinking that is celebrated chiefly in the movies, where the puckish prankster gets away with his high jinks. Didn’t audiences cheer James T. Kirk for beating the Kobayashi Maru, a no-win exercise meant to test students’ character, by hacking the system and reprogramming it to pass a class at Starfleet Academy?We love winners, and we love a rascal. Most of the time. But now Volkswagen’s chief executive, Martin Winterkorn, has resigned, despite his company’s Loki-like ingenuity and the fact that his name sounds like a Bond villain’s. Life, apparently, is less like the movies than many people think.Which brings us to Martin Shkreli, a young financier, pharmaceutical executive and founder of the privately held Turing Pharmaceuticals. He bought the drug Daraprim, which treats parasitic infections, and promptly raised its price to $750 a pill, from $13.50. Plenty of drug companies have increased prices overnight, and intermediators often overcharge for drugs — how much did that aspirin you took in the hospital cost? — but Mr. Shkreli’s move set off a firestorm of scorn and spittle.Maybe it’s because Mr. Shkreli is 32, and looks as if he probably still gets carded in bars. Maybe it’s because he brashly fought back, calling critics morons and defending the move. Or that journalists like my colleague Andrew Pollack have detailed other controversies from his past business dealings.For whatever reason, then, he has become everyone’s bad example. In her presidential campaign, Hillary Rodham Clinton has cited his cocky move in a call for limits on price gouging. Collect Records, a punk-rock label Mr. Shkreli supported, broke off relations with him.A week ago I walked by a loud anti-Shkreli protest on Sixth Avenue in New York City. People were holding up signs with his photograph and slogans like “The Face of Greed.”That’s got to hurt.I asked a crisis consultant, Eric Dezenhall, why Mr. Shkreli had become such a pariah so quickly. His answer was simple: “Chutzpah works if you’re peddling glitzy Manhattan real estate or trash talking a heavyweight opponent in a Vegas fight. When Congress, the F.D.A. and trial lawyers are the gatekeepers to your future, it’s a little less cute.”Now Mr. Shkreli has backed away from his combative stance and says he is lowering the price of the drug, though he hasn’t said by how much.I say it’s time to salute this financial prodigy. He’s bold, and I am a fan of bold thinking. I also love the idea that he named his company Turing Pharmaceuticals, presumably after the cryptography pioneer Alan Turing. Among other things, that genius was famous for the “Turing test,” which asks whether a computer can trick someone into thinking it is a human. This company seemed to be pursuing a different test, one that asks whether a person can masquerade as a soulless computer.But upon further analysis it’s clear that what Mr. Shkreli is up to is just a variant on surge pricing; charging more for things that people really want, or need. That’s the strategy pursued by the tech-powered car service Uber, and it’s worked like a charm!Wild prices are all around us. You can see Broadway’s hottest show, “Hamilton,” tomorrow, if you are willing to pay $477 for a ticket. How fitting for a musical about the man who built the American financial system.But to me, this kind of pricing isn’t used nearly often enough. Think of how much you could actually charge for a public restroom. The one at Madison Square Park costs 25 cents. Imagine how much more you could charge on St. Patrick’s Day, when crowds throng the streets and beverages are consumed. No city would run a deficit under my bladder-surge pricing plan.And on the subject of pills, do you have any idea what a man who wants Viagra would really pay for a pill if the opportunity suddenly arose, or needed to arise?I wanted to ask Mr. Shkreli about all of this, so I got his cellphone number. I’m a reporter, after all, and have skills. Also, throngs of haters on the Internet posted his phone number and other personal information. Anyway, I texted him a request for an interview. “No comment,” he responded.Still, I had so many questions. I’ll ask them here.Mr. Shkreli — may I call you Martin? — how can I make money off your business acumen? Turing is privately held, so a guy like me can’t buy shares. You were planning to take the company public, but that clearly has to be put off for a while.You seem to be the kind of guy who will always make money, and we investors like to latch on to winners. Do we want our executives to be nice? Not really, any more than we want our divorce lawyers to be as friendly as puppies. We claim to like puppies, but we pay for pit bulls.Which brings me to my last question, Mr. Shkreli. With your willingness to take risks and seeming ability to say anything that comes to your head, should you be limiting yourself to the commercial realm?Won’t you please run for president?Sadly, you are still too young. Only 32!But you’re good at math, I know. So think of this arithmetic: In three years, you’ll be 35. Two years after that comes 2020, an election year. Plenty of time to raise the money you need to finance your campaign.Americans are flocking to the candidacies of Donald Trump and Carly Fiorina, the two business titans in the 2016 race. You are younger than either of them and have better hair.So I ask you: Why not Shkreli?You could run on a platform of fixing health care.Can a company scorn profits and still be embraced by Wall Street? Laureate Education, the world’s largest for-profit higher education provider, is about to find out as it seeks to become a public benefit company with a purpose that includes global education and not just profit.Laureate Education disclosed a potential $1 billion initial public offering last week, seeking to return to the public markets. Laureate was taken private in a $3.8 billion buyout led by the private equity firm Kohlberg Kravis Roberts back in 2007.Since that time the company has greatly expanded its global reach and profile. It hired former President Bill Clinton as its honorary chancellor (he reportedly made a total of $16.5 million from 2010 to 2014) and bought campuses in South America and China.And while the for-profit education market is in decline in the United States, with Corinthian Colleges filing for bankruptcy and other for-profit companies in retreat, Laureate is trying to cast itself as a bet on the global education market. Laureate gets only 16 percent of its revenue from the United States; its largest market is Brazil. A majority of its revenue comes from South America.While it generates substantial cash, the company has lost about $227 million in the last two years, mainly because of high interest payments on its debt.Still, with those losses and a volatile market, Laureate was always going to have an uphill battle to complete its I.P.O. That’s why it is a bit odd that the company also announced last week that it would be the first publicly traded public benefit corporation.A public benefit corporation is a new form of company that is only quasi for-profit. The normal corporation is all about the money. But a public benefit corporation specifically allows the company’s board to balance a profit motive against a specific benefit for society at large or the company. In this case Laureate’s benefit is the “positive effect for society and students by offering diverse education programs both online and at campuses around the globe.”This permits Laureate’s board to forgo profits in pursuit of this goal.Laureate is stepping ahead of the trend. The public benefit corporation has a lot of buzz as the hipster alternative to today’s modern company, which is seen as voracious in its appetite for profits. The idea is that by opting out of the purely for-profit motive, a company can better serve its mission and do good.Highlighting this trend, the 20-something favorites Patagonia and Warby Parker have elected to be public benefit corporations. But to date all of the public benefit companies have been private — even Etsy, which is certified as a sustainable business by B Corp, a nonprofit that supports these entities, did not elect to go public as a benefit corporation and instead is a regular for-profit company.It all seems so fantastic — what could be wrong with a company with a social purpose? Don’t we all want to make the world a better place?Well, the eye-grabbing do-gooding may mask deep, complicated issues.First, in a public benefit corporation, the benefit can be hard to define. That appears to be true in the case of Laureate. I’m not particularly sure what creating a “positive effect” through “offering diverse education programs” actually means.Given the vagueness here, instead of being a force for good, Laureate’s benefit may simply result in greenwashing, that is, use of a public-relations-enhancing social purpose to fritter away money without oversight. To be sure, a Delaware-based public benefit corporation is required to be audited every two years for compliance with its objective, and Laureate has picked B Corp as its auditor. Still, given the newness of this form, it is uncertain how rigorous this auditing is, or even can be, given the loose benefit here.This vagueness might be fine in a private company with only a few owners who can do whatever they want with their company — like paying Bill Clinton millions — but Laureate will be public, with thousands of shareholders.Most investors don’t invest for a social purpose; they invest for profit. In particular, most people invest through mutual funds, which in many cases have an explicit fiduciary duty to invest for profit. So the question is whether many of the big institutions will avoid investing in Laureate because of its status.Even beyond that, there is the issue of governance. We just saw the ugly side of companies with multiple purposes in Teva Pharmaceutical Industries’ hostile bid for Mylan, a Dutch company that had reincorporated from Pennsylvania. When Teva arrived, Mylan appeared to discover suddenly that under Dutch law it was required to look after not just stockholders but all of its stakeholders, including not just employees but the world at large. Mylan used this broad standard to reject Teva’s bid. It worked for Mylan, but many of its shareholders seemed bewildered and frustrated that Mylan gave their desire for profits short shrift.Historically, mutual funds and other investors have not focused on the governance of companies undergoing initial public offerings, but in Laureate’s case this may come back to haunt shareholders.Laureate itself has a form of governance that is especially unfriendly to shareholders, which also raises questions about Laureate’s public benefit status. While Laureate is listing its stock as a public benefit corporation, it will also be going public with dual-class stock, which will maintain K.K.R.’s control over the company. This doesn’t make sense. K.K.R. is out to sell its stake at the highest price possible, not benefit other causes. So one has to wonder how strongly Laureate will even pay heed to this standard. As for K.K.R., is this all about public relations more than anything else?That leads to a final criticism. Companies today, even for-profit entities, can do many things that are not immediately profitable. They make donations and support causes all the time. So the real question may be, what is this corporate form good for?I don’t want to be too cynical. Perhaps Laureate will use this newfound purpose to do good, and do well. But before we celebrate, it might be better to see this as an experiment with many ideas to test, and one that investors may not be too happy about.Ken Ard, South Carolina’s former lieutenant governor, has an accent that is the audio equivalent of a chummy slap on the back. Everything he says sounds folksy and congenial. This is true even when he is berating Washington’s political establishment, which he does often these days as the host of a morning show on Live 95.3, a talk-radio station in Florence, S.C.“There is a large part of me that wants to blow it up,” he said on air recently. “That’s the Donald Trump side. A large part of me says, ‘Hey, man, we’ve got a plutocracy that’s bought and sold to special interests. It’s crony capitalism.’ And here comes this crazy fool that doesn’t stand anywhere on any policy other than all over the place. But I believe he’d blow up the building.”By “the building,” Mr. Ard means the federal political system, broadly speaking. Though he joked that if Mr. Trump blew up the White House, he’d construct a hotel on the premises and then crow about it: “He’d say, ‘That’s one of the great addresses of all time, 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue, and I’ve got a property there.’ ”Mr. Ard’s co-host, Dave Baker, chuckled. Then Mr. Ard turned more serious.“What I struggle with is, how bad do I want to blow it up?” he asked. “Or am I willing to do more like a cruise ship and turn it a little bit at a time?”At the moment, Republican voters seem to favor the more eruptive option. That’s one explanation for the popularity of Donald Trump, Carly Fiorina and Ben Carson, who are now collectively the choice of about 50 percent of registered Republican voters, according to a variety of national polls. The three candidates are free of the stigma of elective office. If Washington is the problem, goes the thinking, the solution is sure to come from somewhere else.Anti-establishment fervor has been a recurring theme in American politics for decades. Its catalysts seemed more obvious in the run-up to the two previous presidential elections, when the economy was entering the Great Recession in 2008, or coping with its aftermath in 2012. Economic despair is a potent political force. But we’re now a few years into a recovery, the economy is expanding, albeit modestly, and the jobless rate has dropped to 5.1 percent from a peak of 10 percent in 2009. This makes the indignation of voters a little mystifying.Until you listen to indignant voters. Despite the still nascent recovery, a huge number of people in the middle and lower classes say their wages have not budged in years. For most Americans who are paid by the hour, wages have either fallen or remained flat for more than a decade, according to a report issued by the Economic Policy Institute, a pro-labor think tank based in Washington. The institute called wage stagnation “the country’s central economic challenge.”“It tends to be assumed that if we have growth, people’s hourly wages will improve,” said Lawrence Mishel, president of the institute. “In fact, that has not been the case since 2002, whether you have a college degree or not. And for the most part, this issue has not been confronted by economic policy makers.”On the Democratic side, there have been speeches by the presidential candidate Bernie Sanders, who has spoken about wage stagnation, largely in the context of wealth inequality. But the topic matters to Republicans, too. When asked in a poll to choose one issue that is paramount in deciding their vote, Republicans named the economy and jobs ahead of terrorism, immigration, health care and foreign policy.But Republican candidates have either ignored the issue or tiptoed around its edges, as Mr. Trump does when he talks about the offshoring of jobs to China and Mexico.It is an odd mismatch — flat wages seem to matter a lot to Republican voters, but Republican candidates are all but mum on the subject.Recently, I visited South Carolina, a reliably red state, to get a better sense of why “anti-politicians” have experienced such a sustained surge in Republican polls. In a week of conversations, I heard much more than just venting about wages. There were lamentations that the United States is headed in the wrong direction, either because of failures by President Obama — good luck finding fans of his health care reform — or demographic changes that, in many voters’ estimations, are changing the country too quickly. (Even people who said they had no problem with Mexican immigrants worried that the children of these immigrants would eventually tilt elections in favor of Democrats.) There was a lot of talk about dysfunction and stasis in Washington, as well as concerns about the national debt and annual deficits. Others fretted that the United States now plays a diminished role on the world stage.The mood was pretty glum, and this was before a deluge of rain shut down highways and flooded the state.Along with social and political grievances, the economy in general and flat wages in particular came up time and again. They are part of a large inventory of issues that may explain the appeal of outsider presidential candidates, if only because they earn political capital from anything that has people roiled, because they had no hand in policies that led to the roiling.“I think all three are making a pitch, ‘I’m not what you’re disgusted with,’ ” said Theda Skocpol, a political scientist at Harvard University. “In the G.O.P. base, there is a strong sense that their own party hasn’t done what they wanted them to.”The same day that Mr. Ard wondered whether to raze Washington or nudge it in a different direction, he had lunch with two friends at Red Bone Alley, a local restaurant. When the subject of wages came up, Mr. Ard started to reminisce in a way that I had heard more than a few times.“I remember growing up, a man could work at DuPont, a big plant here in town,” he said, “and the wife would teach school, and before you knew it, they had a beach house. They’d send a kid to University of South Carolina. They’d send a kid to Clemson. They weren’t up to their eyeballs in debt.”“And somewhere in the past 30 years, we’ve lost that,” he said. “I’m not blaming Republicans. I’m not blaming Democrats. But if you’re working at DuPont making 50 grand a year, if you’re teaching, making 40 grand a year, you’re doing all you can to keep your head above water.”“Donald Trump is talking to that family,” he continued. “It’s the family that says, ‘Man, I don’t know what else I can do. I can’t get ahead.’ I think that there is an undercurrent of anger that is far more severe than most politicians ever imagined it was. That’s what Trump has tapped into.”A few days after that lunch, Mr. Trump appeared in Columbia, the state capital. The event was billed as a town hall, with questions from voters presented by Senator Tim Scott, Republican of South Carolina. A near-capacity crowd filled the Koger Center for the Arts, an auditorium that seats about 2,200 people.On their way into the event, Ray and Melissa Lewie, a married couple, stopped and explained why they were attending.“We’re here to hear what he has to say,” said Mr. Lewie, a broad-shouldered man in his early 50s. “I’m so tired of politicians who just do what’s in their best interest, to further their career.”“He’s not a professional politician,” Ms. Lewie said.As for optimism about the economy, neither of them felt any.“You watch the news, and day in, day out, you hear people are getting jobs,” Mr. Lewie said. “I drive a truck for a living, and I drive all around the area, and I don’t see it. The economy’s growing? Not around here, it isn’t.”The Lewies agreed to meet me for dinner a few days later with another couple, their longtime friends Carlos and Leah Veldhoven. Mr. Lewie’s verdict on the Trump event? “Unimpressed,” he said, an opinion shared by his wife. Both found the hour so bereft of particulars that they could hardly take it seriously.For five years, Mr. Veldhoven and Mr. Lewie were long-haul trucking partners. “We were driving as a team,” said Mr. Veldhoven, at the restaurant Bonefish Grill. “Eight hours on, eight hours off. We could make it from L.A. to New York City in a day and a half, two days.”Mr. Veldhoven eventually quit that job to join a car dealership, where he is now manager of the used-car department. Mr. Lewie became a solo driver of an 18-wheeler, a job that has given him a front-seat view of global economic forces at work. For years, one of his regular assignments was hauling disassembled textile mills to container ports in Charleston, where they were floated to Mexico.“Before the equipment was taken apart,” Mr. Lewie said, “the companies would bring people up from Mexico up to South Carolina to learn the jobs. Everyone knew they were being replaced, but they needed the paycheck, and they’d teach the Mexicans until the place closed down.”Today, Mr. Lewie hauls steel construction rods, about 47,000 pounds of them a day. He is an independent contractor who owns his own truck and gets assignments from a company that keeps 23 percent of the revenue generated by each haul. He gets paid by the mile — $1.67 — no matter how many hours he’s on the road.He can burn through up to 600 gallons of fuel a week, a hefty part of his overhead. Fuel prices have come down, which is great news, but maintenance on his truck cost him $26,000 in 2014, and despite low inflation, the price of a new tire has doubled, to $400, in recent years. When we met, he’d earned $1,560 the previous week, before taxes.This is a good living, but when all the numbers are tallied, Mr. Lewie says he is pocketing the same annual income that he did right before the recession. None of this makes him the least bit interested in Bernie Sanders, the candidate who, at least on paper, seems to speak most directly about what ails Mr. Lewie. There’s no way he would vote for someone who calls himself a socialist, Mr. Lewie said. Nor did Mr. Sanders’s policies appeal to him, not even raising the minimum wage. Mr. Lewie’s hauls come from large corporations, and he worries about their financial health more than any frontline employee’s.“For me to prosper, the economy has to prosper,” Mr. Lewie said, “and it’s the rich people that produce jobs.”When asked to assign blame for stagnating wages, he and his wife pointed to the federal government. Regulations and high taxes, he said, not lower wages abroad, led those textile mill companies to move to Mexico.“I was at a mill where the E.P.A. did a walk-around and found oil on the ground and fined the company tens of thousands of dollars,” he said. “You go to Mexico, they don’t have that.” Then again, he acknowledged that he didn’t know what Mexican textile workers were paid, making it hard to pinpoint what role wages played in decisions to relocate.The Lewies and Veldhovens share a visceral dislike for President Obama, and much of their animosity for Washington seems entwined with their ill feelings about the president. The state of the nation, in their eyes, was at an all-time low.“I think we’re at the bottom,” Ms. Lewie said. “It’s everything. Taxes, the economy, the government.”“Our money is being wasted, wasted, wasted,” she added. “And now we’re paying more and more, and our debts are going up and up, and we need to stop the debt. We have to find someone that’s going to actually take control and say, ‘Stop spending.’ ”Her husband said, “I don’t think it could get any worse.”“The government is taking 39 percent now,” said Mr. Lewie, a little morosely, referring to the top income tax bracket. Not for the first time during the meal, he worried that high taxes would discourage the wealthy from producing jobs. “If they want 45 percent, they’ll take that and spend more. If they want 60 percent, they’ll take that and spend more. How much is enough?”The Lewies haven’t settled on a candidate. But they know that their choice would probably be someone who had never worked in Washington.There are political scientists who believe that neither the economy nor paychecks actually motivate voter behavior. They say cultural and social issues, like race relations, immigration and same-sex marriage, are the principal drivers of political choices.“It’s this sense, said Christopher S. Parker, of the University of Washington, “that the country is not what it used to be.”In South Carolina, it is certainly true that holding a dim view of the federal government is something of a tradition. In the span of five days, three different people remarked that South Carolina fired the first shots in the Civil War. Pollsters say that any optimism about the economy here is regarded as the work of state politicians who have succeeded despite the Democrat in the White House.“When you hear any confidence among Republicans,” said Scott Huffmon, a professor at Winthrop University in Rock Hill, S.C., “none of it is attributed to the Obama administration. It’s sort of like, ‘Thank God we have a wall of conservative protection to keep Obama from pushing through.’ ”Florence County, which has a population of about 140,000, has lured some large companies, including Otis Elevator, QVC and General Electric, through aggressive economic outreach and statewide laws that strongly discourage unionization. And some of the county’s 19th-century buildings are being renovated, including a 50,000-square-foot project that includes condos, a restaurant and a rooftop bar.The counties that surround Florence, however, are ailing. The unemployment rate in nearby Marion County, for instance, is about 9.5 percent. And in addition to those seeking jobs, there are the so-called discouraged workers who have stopped looking. Nationwide, there are about seven million or eight million discouraged workers, said Timothy Kane, an economist at the conservative think tank the Hoover Institution.“If supply of labor is ample,” he added, “there is no wage pressure. It’s not a coldhearted attitude to say that employees will be paid what they’re worth to a firm.”That ethos explains the mind-set about wages at McCall Farms, a fruit and vegetable canning company in Effingham, about 10 miles from Florence. The company operates a one-million-square-foot factory, selling 60 items — sweet potatoes, string beans, peaches, apple sauce, and so on — to supermarket chains.“We try to add five or six new products a year,” said Henry Swink, the company’s 70-year-old co-owner. It is a low-margin business, about 2 or 3 percent, and prices haven’t risen much in recent years. But McCall, which is privately held, has done well, Mr. Swink said, though he declined to go into the details. He did, however, explain how McCall has grown.“We’ve invested heavily in our plant,” he said. Specifically, McCall has been upgrading the machines that put lids on cans, and McCall now cans 600 products a minute, double the rate of a few years ago.McCall has also been buying up less nimble rivals — in effect, acquiring their product lines and customers. Interest rates have remained low, a boon to a business that needs to borrow money to invest in equipment. Volume and productivity are up. That means more revenue and profits.On the labor side, the picture is different. The company’s payroll has doubled, to 1,000 employees, in recent years, about 80 percent of whom are hourly earners, Mr. Swink said. They average about $12.50 an hour.“They’ve been given a cost-of-living increase,” he explained. “But that’s about it.”McCall has kept wages steady for hourly employees because there has been little competition for their jobs, and thus no upward pressure on their wages.Their jobs tend to be low skilled — spotting defective vegetables and removing them from production lines, for instance — and McCall would have little problem replacing anyone who wanted to leave.“We do feel some competition for employees,” Mr. Swink said. “Honda has opened a plant here. Roche, the pharmaceutical company, is here. But we are able to get the caliber of employees that we need without an issue.”The 20 percent of salaried employees at McCall have fared better. They tend to be in higher-skilled positions in the maintenance or electrical departments, or working with computers. They could easily jump to a different company. In the last eight years or so, those employees have been given raises of about 15 percent.“I had not thought about it until we discussed it,” Mr. Swink said on the phone, in a follow-up conversation. “The average hourly wage earner here, their lifestyle isn’t getting better. It’s staying the same.”Economists differ about what exactly would help raise wages for hourly workers. Progressive economists urge more government intervention; right-leaning economists urge less. The former say that raising the minimum wage would have ripple effects on the paychecks of employees higher on the pay scale. The latter, such as Edward P. Lazear of the Hoover Institution, argue that increased regulations and capital gains taxes are to blame for stagnant wages and suppressed job creation.The phrase “no silver bullet” came up a lot in discussions on the topic. And the elusiveness of solutions to the wage issue, perhaps, also leads voters to candidates with no Washington experience. In the absence of action and answers, a deep exasperation with the status quo sets in.The day of that meal at the Bonefish Grill, John Boehner, the House speaker, announced that he would resign from Congress, citing a faction within his party that stood against deal-making of any kind with Democrats. It was a reminder that an insurrectionist, “throw the bums out” movement had, in 2010, put a few dozen Republican lawmakers with Tea Party leanings into office. Some were first-time office seekers; all of them had campaigned against Washington.Which makes some wonder: Why would yet another populist wave cure what ails the economy? And why isn’t anger, like that expressed by the Lewies and the Veldhovens, directed at the Republicans?“There is anger at the G.O.P.,” Mr. Lewie said. “That’s why we’re not looking at politicians anymore. What has the Tea Party done? I voted for those candidates.”“We want them out,” his wife said. “We want people.”But isn’t everyone a person until elected, at which point they become a politician?You can never tell what someone will become after they get into office, Mr. Lewie said. “The ones that are entrenched,” he explained, “need to go.”Walmart shares slumped Wednesday after the retail giant tempered its sales forecast for the year, saying growth would be flat, and warned that heavy investments in wages and in e-commerce would curb future earnings.Shares in Walmart, eclipsed by Amazon this year as the world’s biggest retailer by market capitalization, fell as much as 9 percent as executives met with investors in New York.In a bid to soften the blow, Walmart also announced a new $20 billion share buyback program. Still, by midday, Walmart had lost $20 billion in market value as its shares fell to their lowest level in several years.Walmart previously said that it expected net sales to grow 1 to 2 percent for the current fiscal year, through January.Doug McMillon, Walmart’s chief executive, said the company needed to invest to return to growth.“We can deliver stronger financial performance in the short term simply by running our core business better, but that won’t be enough,” Mr. McMillon said.“Retail history is very clear. Those that are unwilling or unable to change go away,” he said. “That’s why we’re taking decisive steps now to change and grow our business.”He acknowledged that competition with e-commerce juggernauts, as well as discounters, remained tough. But in a shot at Amazon, he defended the advantages of Walmart’s large physical store over purely online merchants, asking whether it was easier for a brick-and-mortar store to build up e-commerce or for an e-commerce player to build out stores.“We like our chances,” Mr. McMillon said.Walmart is spending $1.2 billion this year to increase pay for its hourly-wage employees to $9 an hour and $1.5 billion next year to raise wages to $10 an hour. It will also invest $2 billion in its e-commerce arm over the next two years, opening online grocery operations in 20 new markets.Mr. McMillon also said that he was willing to close stores that were underperforming, as well as sell assets, prompting speculation over a potential sale of businesses, like Sam’s Club, whose performance has lagged.Charles Holley, Walmart’s departing chief financial officer, said earnings per share would fall next year by as much as 12 percent before they would recover. The company’s executive vice president, Brett Biggs, is set to succeed Mr. Holley at the end of the year.Mr. Holley asserted that the company expected sales to grow in a range of $45 billion to $60 billion over the next three years, the equivalent of the annual sales of many of the country’s biggest corporations. Walmart’s net sales for its 2014 fiscal year were $482 billion.The economist Angus Deaton has devoted his career to improving the data that shape public policy, including measures of wealth and poverty, savings and consumption, health and happiness.Taking advantage of faster computers and an explosion of newly accessible information, he assembled the details of many individual lives to better understand the sweep of economic trends.On Monday around 6:10 a.m., when his wife handed him the telephone, Mr. Deaton, a professor at Princeton University, learned that he had won the 2015 Nobel Memorial Prize in Economic Science.“To design economic policy that promotes welfare and reduces poverty, we must first understand individual consumption choices,” the Royal Swedish Academy of Sciences said in announcing the economics prize, the last of this year’s Nobels. “More than anyone else, Angus Deaton has enhanced this understanding.”Professor Deaton’s name has appeared for years on lists of likely laureates even though he lacks a namesake theory or defining breakthrough. Despite his relative obscurity, his colleagues and peers said he deserved recognition for refining a rigorous approach to studying economic development based on careful consideration of detailed data.“Suppose you wanted to understand the effect of a subsidy on rice on the well-being of farmers,” said Dani Rodrik, a Harvard professor of international political economy. “He has produced an approach that you can actually use with household data to trace through the effect of something like this on the well-being of different farmers.”Professor Deaton also has championed the collection and use of new kinds of data, particularly about developing countries that often lack the statistics readily available in the United States.In his presidential address to the American Economic Association in 2010, Professor Deaton criticized some popular poverty measures, such as the count of people living on less than $1 day. He said measures like that overstated the prevalence of poverty; he encouraged increased reliance on surveys of individual household circumstances.“Simple ways of looking at the world are often the basis of policy, and if the statements are wrong, then the policy may be wrong also,” said the economist Janet M. Currie, a Princeton colleague. “He’s always had a concern for trying to capture the complexity of the real world.”Professor Deaton also has collaborated in recent years with the psychologist Daniel Kahneman, a fellow Princeton professor and a previous economics laureate, on work showing that happiness increases with income, but only up to about $75,000 a year. (Measures that ask people to assess overall well-being show that more money helps beyond that figure.)Professor Deaton, 69, was born in Scotland and educated at Cambridge before taking a job at Princeton in 1983. He is a British and American citizen.Professor Currie, a former student of Professor Deaton’s and now his nominal boss as chairwoman of the economics department at Princeton, described him as “enormously funny and witty and well read, frighteningly erudite and very good company.”In an interview on Monday, Professor Deaton said he had taken an interest in economic development because “there’s a real moral urgency to understanding how people behave and what we should or might be able to do about it.”He said the circumstances of his upbringing also played a role.“I grew up in Edinburgh,” he said. “It was a cold, messy and miserable place to grow up, and I dreamed of going to tropical, colorful, hot countries.”Economics before the 1980s relied on the assumption that the people represented by a large economic aggregate behaved in roughly the same way, not because that made sense but because accounting for diversity was too hard.Faster computers allowed the creation of models that incorporated differences in behavior. The Nobel committee cited Professor Deaton’s work around 1980 in modeling demand for individual goods, which was both some of the earliest work in that vein and a model that remains in wide use.In continuing his research, he found that rising incomes tend to improve calorie intake for the poorest families, but the effect diminishes at higher income levels. Aggregate statistics, as a result, obscured the benefits of income gains for very poor families.“What he’s shown is that you do learn a great deal more by looking at the behavior that underlies the aggregates,” said Duncan Thomas, an economist at Duke University and another former student.Professor Thomas said he also admired Professor Deaton’s clarity. “He will bring evidence to the table in a way that makes you say, ‘Well, of course that has to be right,’ ” Professor Thomas said.Professor Deaton said he hoped “carefulness in measurement” would be his legacy. He said his mentor, Richard Stone, a Cambridge professor who won the Nobel in economics in 1984, had ingrained in him the importance of good data. “I’ve always wanted to be like him,” Professor Deaton said. “I think putting numbers together into a coherent framework always seemed to me to be what really matters.”His work also is marked by an insistence that theories must explain these more complicated sets of facts. “A good theoretical account must explain all of the evidence that we see,” Professor Deaton wrote in a 2011 essay on his life in economics. “If it doesn’t work everywhere, we have no idea what we are talking about, and all is chaos.”He has perhaps contributed more to the disruption of old understandings than the creation of new ones.“There’s a fair amount of policy agnosticism that comes from this — it emphasizes more the heterogeneity of outcomes,” Professor Rodrik said of Professor Deaton. “He’s somebody with quite a sharp tongue, and he’s often had as his target people who make very strong statements about this policy or that policy.”Proponents of foreign aid programs are a frequent target. Professor Deaton has argued that such investments often undermine local governance and the development of institutions necessary to sustain development.One conclusion his writings have emphasized is the astonishing break between most of human history and modern times.“Life is better now than at almost any time in history,” he wrote in the opening lines of his 2013 book “The Great Escape,” a popular account of his work. “More people are richer and fewer people live in dire poverty. Lives are longer and parents no longer routinely watch a quarter of their children die.”He counts climate change and increased economic inequality in developed nations as threats to this progress. He has noted in other work that inequality occurs naturally because of divergent luck, but he has said that the growing gaps in recent years pose a new economic and political challenge.“I think inequality has gone past the point where it’s helping us all get rich, and it’s really becoming a serious threat,” he said. Professor Deaton said he was “pretty sleepy” when he took the telephone from his wife Monday morning.“I was surprised and delighted,” he said. “It was wonderful to hear the voices of my friends on the committee.”Hoping to offer more alternatives, particularly to low-income students considering substandard for-profit colleges, the Education Department is unveiling a pilot program on Wednesday to allow students to use federal loans and grants for nontraditional education like boot camp software coding programs and MOOCs, or massive open online courses.At the moment, only programs offered by accredited schools are eligible to receive federal student aid and loans. This initiative would sidestep that regulation by permitting aid to flow to students who enroll in experimental programs approved by the Education Department.The pilot would rely on its own quality assurance measures rather than depend on accreditation panels, which have come under fire in recent years from both Congress and education experts for failing to adequately monitor poorly performing institutions.“The existing accrediting agencies aren’t being hard enough on the schools,” said Debbie Cochrane, research director at the Institute for College Access and Success. “They’re the ones that are supposed to sign off on the quality of the institutions. Clearly too many subpar ones are slipping through the cracks.”Coding boot camps have exploded in popularity in the last year or so. In addition to testing new types of educational programs that emerge from outside the traditional arena of colleges and universities, government officials said they are also exploring new methods to evaluate quality.For the pilot program, officials said that independent evaluators could conceivably come from industry associations or groups of employers who know the kind of skills they need and are in the best position to judge outcomes.Officials at the Education Department said they expect to announce further steps later this month to tighten the accreditation process.State prosecutors and education officials have cracked down in recent years on for-profit colleges after a flood of complaints that they were exploiting low-income strivers and veterans by enrolling them in overpriced courses that failed to deliver meaningful returns.The responsibility for policing higher education institutions is jointly shared by a variety of accrediting boards, states and the federal government. But critics charge that not enough has been done to end abusive practices. More gatekeepers have often meant less accountability, said Barmak Nassirian, director of federal relations and policy analysis at the American Association of State College and Universities. “Everybody’s in charge,” he said, “means no one is in charge.”Ms. Cochrane cited Brown Mackie College, a for-profit college in Tucson, as an example of how abuses could go on before being detected. That college used supplies intended for veterinary technicians to teach nursing students and sent them to train at a hospice without faculty supervision. Representatives from the Accrediting Council for Independent Colleges and Schools inspected the school last week, according to a report in The Arizona Daily Star.The college said it has improved its practices. “We’ve made significant administrative and academic changes at the school to ensure that our students are provided with a quality education that prepares them for professional practice in their chosen field,” said Chris Hardman, senior vice president for communications at Education Management Corporation, which owns Brown Mackie. He added that the college had promised to refund the money paid by the nursing students who were scheduled to graduate last June.Education Department officials say they have been working to ensure that for-profit colleges don’t sidestep regulations, but they have also called on Congress, states and accrediting boards to do more as well.“We need Congress to take action to ensure that institutions are held accountable and that accreditors are not solely responsible for ensuring the quality of programs,” said Ted Mitchell, the under secretary of education.Senator Marco Rubio of Florida, who has been talking on the campaign trail about busting the accreditation “cartel,” introduced a bill last month with Senator Michael Bennet, Democrat of Colorado, to create a voluntary system of accreditation. “This alternative accreditation system we’ve proposed is built on higher quality standards and outcomes than the current accreditation system and would mark an important first step to shake up a higher education system that leaves too many people with tons of student loan debt and without degrees that lead to good paying jobs,” Mr. Rubio said.But education advocates were wary of any system that relied on a voluntary component, saying it could lead to further abuses.“If you are going to allow federal aid without accreditation, as the senators propose,” said David Halperin, a Washington lawyer who has frequently criticized for-profit colleges, “then you have to replace it with something that provides for real accountability.”PUNE, India — Play-Doh, Monopoly and practically all of Hasbro’s other toys were made in China for decades. Now, Hasbro is changing course.While the company still sources expensive, complex toys like the electronic FurReal Friends from China, Hasbro has contracts for production in Turkey, Indonesia, Vietnam and Mexico. It has moved most aggressively into India, where Hasbro now buys from several sizable factories, and another is planned.Multinationals around the globe have begun to look seriously at manufacturing in India, with its plentiful and inexpensive labor pool. But the investment doesn’t mean doing business in India is getting easier. Rather, it is a sign that doing business in China is getting more difficult.The Hong Kong-based Musical Group decided to build the latest Hasbro factory in India after facing severe labor shortages and soaring wages at its main factory in southern China. But Musical, like many companies, is running headlong into India’s bureaucratic morass over land purchases, and the project is months behind schedule.“We’ve had a very tough negotiation with the local government,” said Christopher Tse, the managing director of the Musical Group, which for nearly 35 years did almost all its manufacturing in China. “It takes more time than I expected.”For Prime Minister Narendra Modi of India, the situation presents a political and economic challenge.More than a year ago, Mr. Modi, wearing a traditional bright yellow jacket and standing below an immense logo of an Indian tiger, unveiled an ambitious effort to ramp up manufacturing. The “Make in India” campaign promised to reduce bureaucracy and improve infrastructure, paving the way for big multinationals and other foreign investors. It was a cornerstone of his candidacy.Since then, almost nothing has gone as planned.Progress in improving the country’s inadequate roads, rail lines and ports has been slow. Corruption remains pernicious. Urban air pollution is even worse in India than in China, and could deteriorate further as more factories are built.Plans to rewrite labor and land laws, and to overhaul state taxes, have stalled in Parliament. And an effort by Mr. Modi to bypass Parliament with temporary executive orders has run into trouble as well.Mr. Modi’s most controversial but potentially far-reaching executive order — making it easier to convert farmland into factory sites — expired on Aug. 31. He chose not to renew it. The ordinance had became a political liability in state elections, as farmers feared that it might be used to push them off their land.“Ease of doing business is still a work in progress,” said India’s finance minister, Arun Jaitley, adding that state governments were starting to reform land and labor laws.Yet slowly and a little unpredictably, India’s manufacturing sector is starting to attract overseas investment.Foxconn, the world’s largest contract manufacturer of smartphones and other electronics, which has most of its factories in China, agreed in August to open 10 to 12 plants in western India by 2020, employing as many as 50,000 workers. A week earlier, General Motors announced plans to invest $1 billion to develop new car models for the Indian market and nearly double the size of its seven-year-old factory on the outskirts of Pune.CNH Industrial of Italy is building an agricultural harvester factory nearby. Ford opened a sprawling car assembly plant in northwestern India this year, and Daimler has added an extensive assembly line for buses to its truck factory in southeastern India.“If you’re able to manufacture a world-class product in India, the economics of exporting are quite lucrative,” said Rustom Desai, the managing director of Corning’s India operations, which include a highly automated optic fiber factory here.Indian officials see manufacturing as essential to their country’s future. They have 10 million young workers a year joining the labor force and few alternatives to create enough jobs.Devendra Fadnavis, an ally of Mr. Modi who is the chief minister of Maharashtra state that includes Mumbai and Pune, has been aggressively marketing his state’s huge labor force in trips to China and elsewhere. “We have the human resources — if we can liberate them, we can pioneer the industrial production for the entire world,” Mr. Fadnavis said.The pitch has worked. Foreign direct investment in India is up 46 percent over the last two years. It is down 1.3 percent in China, although it shows signs of a modest rebound lately.The recent flood of foreign investment is helping propel India, which is expected to be the fastest-growing major economy in the world this year. The International Monetary Fund estimated this month that India’s economy would increase 7.3 percent in 2015, compared with 6.8 percent this year in China.In many ways, India is benefiting from the challenges facing China.Blue-collar wages in China have more than quintupled in the last decade and companies face worker shortages despite economic weakness. “If you want to hire 1,000 workers, you only find 600, and the turnover will be 15 or 20 percent a month,” said Mr. Tse of Musical Group, the Hasbro supplier.Some multinationals also worry that China is becoming a politically riskier place to do business. Such concerns have been heightened by the country’s growing show of force, like the sight of thousands of goose-stepping soldiers  parading through Tiananmen Square on Sept. 3, or the rapid construction of military-grade airfields this year on hastily built artificial islands in the disputed South China Sea.By comparison, India offers a stable democracy and low wages. Even skilled factory workers here in Pune, sometimes called the Detroit of India, earn about $300 a month, half of Chinese wages.Maintaining its edge won’t be easy for India.For one, India needs to significantly upgrade its roads, ports and other infrastructure.. Musical Group initially considered building a factory about 200 kilometers, or 120 miles outside Kolkata, formerly Calcutta. India’s poor roads meant the trip would take four hours.“In China, 200 kilometers is two hours,” said Mr. Tse. He ultimately decided to seek costlier land a few miles from the port, only to encounter slow-moving local officials.India is also trying to expand manufacturing just as global trade stalls. A big export push by India could prompt a backlash in other countries, said Raghuram Rajan, the governor of the Reserve Bank of India and former chief economic adviser to the Indian government.“To expect another China to come in without any political reaction would be naïve,” he said in an interview in Mumbai. “We’re going to have a much tougher fight for market share.”While many multinationals are enthralled by the potential of the India consumer, it may be difficult for the domestic market to absorb a lot of extra production.At least four Chinese smartphone manufacturers — Huawei, OnePlus, Coolpad and Oppo — have said they plan to produce handsets in India, while Xiaomi is cooperating with Foxconn to assemble phones in India and Lenovo plans to work with Flextronics. As China’s market approaches saturation, millions of Indians each year are buying smartphones for the first time.But higher-end manufacturers like carmakers are still struggling to break into a market that has yet to create a broad middle class.India’s population has nearly passed China’s. But automakers sell nearly two million cars a month in China, compared with 200,000 a month in India. The best-selling cars in India tend to be very inexpensive subcompacts manufactured by local companies like Maruti, not the larger but costlier models sold by the multinationals.Even among the affluent, “someone who can afford an Acura will probably buy a Civic,” said Paul Blokland, the director of Segment Y, an automotive research firm based in Goa, India.Millions of Indians are on the cusp of affording cars, although most cannot do so yet. Vishal Rode, a 31-year-old autoworker here who has a 3-year-old daughter and a newborn son, earns $80 a week. He had to take out a three-year loan just to buy a $780 motorcycle, but is convinced that better times will come.“I want to buy a car in the future,” he said. “In the last 10 years, a lot of things have changed.”All 13 restaurants in Danny Meyer’s Union Square Hospitality Group will eliminate tipping as part of a sweeping change in how employees are rewarded, the company announced Wednesday.The move will affect establishments that serve 40,000 to 50,000 meals a week and range from simple museum cafes to some of the most popular and acclaimed restaurants in the country, including Union Square Cafe and Gramercy Tavern. The first to adopt the change, next month, will be the Modern, inside the Museum of Modern Art, with the others to follow by the end of next year.A number of restaurants around the country have adopted a no-tipping policy over the last several years. Some have done it through a mandatory surcharge, others by raising menu prices, the tactic that Union Square Hospitality Group will follow.Mr. Meyer said that by raising prices and ending gratuities, he hoped to be able to raise pay for cooks, dishwashers and other kitchen workers, while keeping compensation roughly the same for servers, who currently get most of their income from tips. By law, kitchen staff cannot share in pooled tips.“The gap between what the kitchen and dining-room workers make has grown by leaps and bounds,” Mr. Meyer said. During his 30 years in the business, “kitchen income has gone up no more than 25 percent.”“Meanwhile,” he added, “dining-room pay has gone up 200 percent.”If wages for kitchen employees, particularly cooks, do not keep pace with the cost of living, he said, “it is not going to be sustainable to attract the culinary talent that the city needs to keep its edge.”Mr. Meyer said that no changes were planned at Shake Shack, a chain of burger outlets spun off from the Union Square Hospitality Group.The climate has been changing forever. It will continue to change. Some scientists believe that humans have a direct impact on it. But trying to curb carbon emissions to slow the change could destroy the economy, eliminate millions of jobs and cast Americans into poverty.This is what’s known today as the moderate Republican position on climate change, held by presidential hopefuls like Jeb Bush, Marco Rubio and Chris Christie.Then there are Republicans like James Inhofe, the chairman of the Senate committee responsible for the environment, who calls global warming “the greatest hoax,” and Senator Ted Cruz of Texas, another presidential contender, who argues that the scientific case for seeking to curb climate change is nothing more than a liberal plot aimed at “massive government control of the economy, the energy sector and every aspect of our lives.”It wasn’t always so. These views, in fact, stand in sharp contrast to the mainstream position of the Republican Party less than a decade ago.“We stand warned by serious and credible scientists across the world that time is short and the dangers are great,” John McCain, the Republican candidate for president, said in the spring of 2008. “Instead of idly debating the precise extent of global warming, or the precise timeline of global warming, we need to deal with the central facts of rising temperatures, rising waters and all the endless troubles that global warming will bring.”What accounts for this remarkable collective turnaround, unique among political parties around the world, even as climate scientists have accumulated greater evidence of how humanity is dangerously altering the planet?As it turned out, a well-financed push by fossil fuel interests to deny climate science dovetailed smoothly with the burst of anti-government anger that gave rise to the Tea Party from the depths of the Great Recession.“The Republican Party was much less unified around climate before,” said David Goldston, who runs the government affairs program at the Natural Resources Defense Council. “It has gotten more and more right-wing and become more and more single-minded on the issue.”President George W. Bush and his vice president, Dick Cheney, may have been closely tied to Big Oil and done nothing to reduce the emissions of heat-trapping greenhouse gases warming the atmosphere. Still, added Mr. Goldston, “it was never ever the position of the Bush administration that climate change was not a real and man-made phenomenon.”Yet even Senator McCain has now walked away from his previous self, mocking President Obama for “saying that the biggest problem we have is climate change.”“McCain was a champ,” said Gene Karpinski, head of the League of Conservation Voters, which tracks Congress members’ stance on environmental issues. “He would go around the country and talk about climate change. Even when he was the nominee, he didn’t walk away. But when a member of the Tea Party ran against him in the 2010 primary, he went south and never came back.”This shift has made it impossible to pass any legislation in Congress to help deal with the problem. That has forced President Obama to adopt a different approach.After the 2010 defeat in the Senate of the so-called cap-and-trade strategy, which was originally a Republican idea, Mr. Obama has taken to using the Environmental Protection Agency’s regulatory powers under the Clean Air Act, circumventing Congress entirely.This solution is more expensive, however, and makes it more difficult to achieve necessary goals. A more efficient strategy will require bipartisan support. “We can’t win on the federal legislative policy unless we regain Republican support,” Mr. Karpinski said.Is it possible to turn the Republican Party around?It won’t be easy. Republican leaders like Mitch McConnell of Kentucky are wedded to defending a declining coal industry and advancing the interests of oil companies, most clearly in their support for the Keystone pipeline. Many of the party’s lawmakers and presidential candidates get a lot of money from people like the Koch brothers, who have multimillion-dollar contributions for anybody who will stand against efforts to curb the use of fossil fuels.But there is more than money to the story. For many Republicans, climate change poses an existential quagmire. “To them it sounds like, ‘Everything we’ve been doing since the Industrial Revolution is going to kill us; the response must be a big government response and, by the way, it has to be international,’ ” said Mr. Goldston.For the angry supporters of the Tea Party, opposed to government spending in almost any form, the prescription is anathema. “If you decide climate change is real, there must be a role for government to combat it. So the only way out is to deny it exists,” Mr. Karpinski said.For all these obstacles, though, it may be possible to thread a solution through the tangle of ideology and money.For one thing, climate change denial has never been particularly strong among street-level Republicans. Recent polls find that even conservative Republicans believe the climate is changing and humans are, to some extent, to blame.Last month, 11 Republicans in the House introduced a resolution that — tortuously worded though it may have been — acknowledged the need to “address the causes and effects” of a changing climate.“I can count eight, 10, maybe 12 Republicans in the Senate who are waiting for the jailbreak,” said Sheldon Whitehouse, Democrat of Rhode Island. “When the moment comes, they could all jump together.”Straight denial is getting tougher as the scientific consensus strengthens. And China’s efforts to cut emissions have defanged the argument that it is pointless for the United States to act alone.In this context, the Obama administration’s strategy of using the Clean Air Act to force emissions cuts could help change the politics.“Some Republican governors will start taking action because the alternative is for the federal government to impose something,” Mr. Goldston said. “This will change the politics. Maybe in the next Congress or the one after that, people will think they need to work something out legislatively.”The critical thing to understand is that a Republican-compatible strategy to slow the changing climate does exist.N. Gregory Mankiw of Harvard University, George W. Bush’s former top economic adviser, argues that putting a price on carbon emissions — the preferred prescription of economists across the political spectrum— could fit well within the Republican canon.“People are afraid this is an excuse to raise taxes and expand government generally,” Professor Mankiw said. “We need to convince them this not a tax increase but a tax shift,” using revenue from a carbon tax to reduce, say, the Social Security  payroll tax, while keeping the overall tax burden roughly the same.This is a message not just for climate deniers on the right but also for environmental activists on the left.Eli Lehrer, who runs the R Street Institute, a fairly conventional conservative research firm except that it supports a carbon tax to combat climate change, argued that the Republicans’ stance was “a direct reaction to the Democrats’ efforts to use scientific facts to try to dictate public policy.”Sure, climate change is real, Mr. Lehrer acknowledged. Yet “the science doesn’t — and can’t — demand any particular public policy and certainly doesn’t dictate that we do what the left wants.”To break the logjam, not to mention overcome the Koch brothers’ money, liberal advocates might have to temper their ambitions. Pushing for a maximalist strategy could be a prescription for ensuring that no environmental agenda is enacted at all.FORT McMURRAY, Alberta — At a camp for oil workers here, a collection of 16 three-story buildings that once housed 2,000 workers sits empty. A parking lot at a neighboring camp is now dotted with abandoned cars. With oil prices falling precipitously, capital-intensive projects rooted in the heavy crude mined from Alberta’s oil sands are losing money, contributing to the loss of about 35,000 energy industry jobs across the province.Yet Alberta Highway 63, the major artery connecting Northern Alberta’s oil sands with the rest of the country, still buzzes with traffic. Tractor-trailers hauling loads that resemble rolling petrochemical plants parade past fleets of buses used to shuttle workers. Most vehicles carry “buggy whips” — bright orange pennants attached to tall spring-loaded wands — to help prevent them from being run over by the 1.6-million-pound dump trucks used in the oil sands mines.Despite a severe economic downturn in a region whose growth once seemed limitless, many energy companies have too much invested in the oil sands to slow down or turn off the taps. In addition to the continued operation of existing plants, construction persists on projects that began before the price fell, largely because billions of dollars have already been spent on them. Oil sands projects are based on 40-year investment time frames, so their owners are being forced to wait out slumps.“It really is tough right now,” said Greg Stringham, the vice president for markets and oil sands at the Canadian Association of Petroleum Producers, a trade group that generally speaks for the industry in Alberta. “We see kind of a lot of volatility over the next four or five years.”After an extraordinary boom that attracted many of the world’s largest energy companies and about $200 billion worth of investments to oil sands development over the last 15 years, the industry is in a state of financial stasis, and navigating the decline has proved challenging. Pipeline plans that would create new export markets, including Keystone XL, have been hampered by environmental concerns and political opposition. The hazy outlook is creating turmoil in a province and a country that has become dependent on the energy business.Canada is now dealing with the economic fallout, having slipped into a mild recession earlier this year. And Alberta, which relies most heavily on oil royalties, now expects to post a deficit of 6 billion Canadian dollars, or about $4.5 billion. The political landscape has also shifted.Last spring, a left-of-center government ended four decades of Conservative rule in Alberta. Federally, polls suggest that the Conservative party — which championed Keystone XL and repeatedly resisted calls for stricter greenhouse gas emission controls in the oil sands — is struggling to get re-elected in October.“The pendulum has swung,” said Stephen Ross, the president of Devonian Properties, an Alberta development company that has built several residential and commercial properties in Fort McMurray.Since the end of the World War ll, oil has made Alberta wealthy. The increase in oil sands development since the early 2000s had only intensified the province’s good fortune and turned obscure Fort McMurray into a boomtown and an outsize contributor to the entire Canadian economy.When Mr. Ross first bought development land here in 2000, he paid about 27,000 Canadian dollars an acre. He stopped buying land long before it hit one million Canadian dollars an acre.“The town has had huge growing pains,” Mr. Ross said. “It’s like something you’ve never seen.”Operating oil sands plants quickly decreased budgets and cut services, like equipment cleaning, which were deemed optional. And as portions of construction projects are finished, construction workers are sent packing. The halt on new projects has left order books increasingly blank at a variety of suppliers, like engineering firms.Since the price collapse, Teck Resources has delayed the start of its oil sands project by five years to 2026. Cenovus Energy substantially reduced budgets for its long-term developments. And Osum Oil Sands has set aside some of the expansion planned for a project it purchased from Shell last year. The Chinese-owned company Nexen, which had its oil sands production curtailed by regulators for about a month in August because of a pipeline leak, has deferred plans to build another upgrader facility, where tar-like bitumen of the oil sands is converted into synthetic crude oil, until the end of 2020.These projects, and others that have begun over the last 15 years, have largely been built and operated by an itinerant work force. These workers fly into Fort McMurray’s new airport terminal and are bused to work camps up to two hours away. Their lives are a cycle of three straight weeks of long shifts interrupted by 10-day trips home.That transient population has little or no connection to the city when working. When laid off, they become unemployment statistics, not in Alberta, but in the provinces of their hometowns. It’s also in those regions, more than Alberta, where the loss of once-large paychecks is most felt, having a ripple effect across the country.For Canadian oil executives, the significant shift in the province’s politics is of great concern. Rachel Notley, the new premier and leader of the New Democratic Party, has said that she would prefer more refining to take place in Alberta instead of shipping more oil sands production to the United States via Keystone XL. And speaking to the Alberta Chamber of Commerce last month, Ms. Notley told the energy industry that it must “clean up its environmental act.”One executive and investor, who did not want to be named while the province is reviewing his industry, said growing sentiment that the industry does not pay Alberta enough in royalties and lags on environmental protections will kill new investments, even if prices start to rise.“There’s never been a time when I’ve been less optimistic,” he said. “The general public doesn’t know how bad it is. It just hasn’t hit yet.”He did, however, acknowledge that environmentalists had won the debate on Keystone XL as well as various other pipeline plans.“I don’t know how the issue got away, but it’s obvious now that it did,” he said.And the workers who have benefited from the boom are now realizing that their stretch of good luck might be over, permanently.Réjean Godin, a truck driver and heavy equipment operator, began the long-distance commute from the Atlantic province of New Brunswick 13 years ago. Since then, he’s earned wages four or five times the rate of those back home, an area of high unemployment.Standing near his well-worn Toyota RAV4 that still bears New Brunswick license plates, Mr. Godin, who lives in a work camp, recited all of the different projects in which hundreds of workers had been laid off — layoffs that he’d learned about over the previous few days. He fears that the days of high pay for delivering water to work camps and hauling their sewage away may be over for both himself and his 30-year-old son, who joined him in Alberta.“I’m not sure if we’re going to come next year,” Mr. Godin said in the dusty yard of a trucking company in Fort MacKay, Alberta, a town down the Athabasca River from Fort McMurray. “What you hear everywhere is the price is low so we’ve got to cut this, we’ve got to shut that down a little bit. We go day by day because we never know.”The first thing you notice when hanging around technology start-ups is the cultural importance that Silicon Valley ascribes to snacking, with a company’s snack bar often standing as a rough proxy for the scope of its ambitions.Square, Jack Dorsey’s payments business, boasts a gleaming coffee bar with a barista who hosts classes on the best ways to brew. On one trip to Facebook, I was treated to an otherworldly bag of popcorn. And just about every company has a refrigerator or two stocked with Hint, a subtly flavored brand of bottled water that seems to flow as freely in San Francisco as the tears of the people who were evicted to make room for the incoming software engineers.Even when a start-up’s dreams are deferred, the snacks hang on, as I learned during a recent visit to the buses that were once owned by Leap Transit, a start-up that once had aspirations of revolutionizing urban transportation.Leap, which raised $2.5 million from some of the industry’s best-known investors, charged riders $6 to get across San Francisco, nearly three times the price of a city bus. Its primary draw was luxury. Each bus had a wood-trimmed interior outfitted with black leather seats, individual USB ports and Wi-Fi. The buses also offered a steady stream of gourmet snacks, sold via app.I’d come to the see the buses to find out what it looks like when a start-up bites the dust. The luxury vehicles were up for auction; Leap filed for bankruptcy in July. The end for Leap apparently came so suddenly that its founders didn’t have time to remove much from the vehicles. Inside each bus sitting in an out-of-the-way parking lot near Oakland, Calif., was a state registration form pinned to the wall, a bundle of iPhone and HDMI cables, and a display case full of snacks. Among the choices were packages of That’s It — vegan, gluten-free, non-GMO fruit bars — and organic, paleo Simple Squares.Leap is one of at least several dozen tech companies that have failed this year. Their deaths are illuminating; dead start-ups show us which investors’ theories are bogus, which technologies aren’t ready for prime time, and which common ways founders overextend themselves. They also outline the frontiers of what the current market for tech products and services will bear.In particular, Leap’s death suggests one emerging cause of start-up doom, a problem that also did in the anonymous social-network Secret: too-close an association with Silicon Valley’s tech-bro sensibilities.Leap, in retrospect, was a bold idea that might have had legs. Muni, San Francisco’s public bus system, is overloaded and underfunded, and the success of ride-hailing apps like Uber suggests a public willingness to try new tech-enabled options. But in its design and marketing — in its full-frontal embrace of the easily pilloried paleo-snack-bar techie lifestyle — Leap exuded a kind of bourgeoisie exceptionalism that fed into the city’s fears of gentrification and won it few fans. As I stood inside the abandoned buses, it became obvious why the start-up failed: Leap was created by and for tech bros. It was born inside the bubble, and it could never escape.Tech deaths often go unstudied. Silicon Valley stands out for the way it embraces failure, and it’s true that the “We Failed!” start-up post-mortem note has become a staple on publishing sites like Medium. Still, there’s a natural disinclination among entrepreneurs and investors to discuss the deaths of their companies in much depth. Kyle Kirchhoff, the co-founder and chief executive of Leap, was among several founders of dead companies who did not respond to my requests for interviews.Thanks to such reluctance, no one quite knows how many tech start-ups are dying, or why. “There’s a lot of fanfare when companies get funded or acquired, but people bury the dead pretty quietly,” said Anand Sanwal, the chief executive of CB Insights, a firm that keeps stats on the start-up market. He added that the task is complicated by the fact that many failed start-ups don’t actually die — they limp along for years, underperforming.Mr. Sanwal estimated that the number of start-up failures increased in 2015, but he believed the uptick was most likely because many more companies were founded and funded a few years ago, as the tech market began heating up. “There were companies that went in at the top of the funnel, so a lot more of them are meeting that fate,” he said.Leap’s troubles started early. It began a private bus service in San Francisco in 2013. Even though it had no valid city or state license, the company decided to use city bus stops to pick up and drop off passengers — a practice that earned it immediate scorn from city officials and cast the service as part of the tech-versus-everyone-else narrative of gentrification in San Francisco. The company went on hiatus in 2014 while its founders worked with state and city officials to win a preliminary certificate to operate. Among the stipulations was that Leap refrain from using city bus stops.When Leap began operating again in March, the company struck a sour note in the news media, embracing so many techie stereotypes you could be forgiven for thinking it was cooked up by the writers of HBO’s “Silicon Valley.”In an interview with TechCrunch, Mr. Kirchhoff called the buses “a blend between a coffee shop, a workspace and something that feels like your living room.” He demonstrated, for a reporter from The Verge, how riders could order organic juice. As Katie Dowd, a writer for SFGate.com, noted: “Predictably but hilariously, there is no one who appears to be over the age of 35 in any of the publicity photos or video. Muni is for old people, obviously.” Making matters worse, the San Francisco Chronicle reported that Leap had removed wheelchair accessibility ramps from its buses to make room for “plush leather armchairs.”In May, two months after Leap began operating, the California Public Utilities Commission sent the company a cease-and-desist letter because the company had started offering service before finalizing the conditions of its original approval notice. On its Facebook page, Leap promised to take a short break while it worked through the issues. It has been dormant ever since.By the time of its bankruptcy auction earlier this month, which attracted only a handful of bidders, Leap was all but forgotten. In its bankruptcy filing, Leap reported that it made nearly $21,000 in the two months during which it offered service. That turned out to be less than two of its buses — which officials told me could no longer start — fetched at auction: One sold for $11,100, and another for $12,100. The buyers were anonymous.Could Leap have fared better if it had a taken a less outwardly oppositional stance in its conduct and its branding? It seems likely that would have helped. The company had entered the thicket of San Francisco regulatory and civic debate without spending much time to win over fans in the community. Its on-board aesthetics and services lit up every gentrification warning sign, such that, from the start, Leap seemed designed only for those people — the tech people who give everyone else a bad name.Some companies can escape their image. Uber, a company whose endless run-ins with authorities have covered its brand in an ethical haze, is still experiencing growth because the product remains truly useful to riders and drivers. But the winners are the exceptions. Most companies can’t repeat unlikely success. Leap tried. Despite the snacks, it failed.Wells Fargo, one of the nation’s most profitable large banks, on Wednesday reported financial results for the third quarter that mildly exceeded Wall Street’s expectations.The bank, the fourth largest in the country by assets, said it earned $5.8 billion, or $1.05 a share in the third quarter, up 1 percent from the quarter a year ago and exceeding analysts’ forecast for the period by a penny.Although small, the profit increase may be welcome to management and shareholders. In this year’s second quarter, Wells reported a yearly decline in net income, the first in many quarters.Wells Fargo’s revenue for the third quarter was $21.9 billion, slightly above what analysts surveyed by Thomson Reuters had expected, and 3 percent higher than the $21.2 billion reported in same period a year ago.Wells Fargo does not have a large presence on Wall Street, insulating it from much of the recent turbulence in global markets. It instead makes most of its money from lending to consumers and companies. Investors value the bank more highly than its rivals because of its relatively stable Main Street revenue, its lower costs and its ability to sell more than one product to its customers.In the third quarter, Wells Fargo remained more profitable than the other two large banks that have already reported earnings for the period. Wells Fargo’s return on equity — a closely watched yardstick that measures profits as a percentage of shareholders’ equity – was 12.6 percent in the third quarter, compared with 12 percent at JPMorgan Chase, which reported on Tuesday, and 7 percent for Bank of America, which reported on Wednesday.Still, Wells Fargo’s return on equity is lower than in previous periods, suggesting that the bank may have hit something of a wall. The sluggish revenue growth explains part of the drop in profitability, but the profit margin that Wells Fargo earns on its loans and securities has fallen even as its loans and securities have increased.Wells Fargo had $903 billion in loans in the third quarter, up 8 percent from $839 billion in the third quarter of last year. Loans to companies are growing faster at the bank than loans to consumers.“Wells Fargo’s strong third-quarter results reflected the ability of our diversified business model to generate consistent financial performance in an uneven economic environment while continuing to meet our customers’ financial needs,” John Stumpf, Wells Fargo’s chief executive, said in a statement.Eight times in Tuesday night’s Democratic debate, candidates mentioned a law that Congress passed in 1933, was signed by Franklin Delano Roosevelt, and hasn’t been the law of the land in the United States for 16 years.This prompts some obvious questions. What is the Glass-Steagall Act, why do the candidates Bernie Sanders and Martin O’Malley want to reinstate it, and how did it come to star in a presidential debate in 2015?When people talk about banking, they are talking about two broad classes of activities. Commercial banking is what happens at your neighborhood branch: You deposit money in a checking or savings account, and the bank uses those deposits to make loans to consumers or small businesses. Investment banking refers to the kind of banking activity more common on Wall Street, like helping large companies issue stock or bonds in order to fund themselves, and trading securities in hope of making a profit.In the depths of the Great Depression, a widespread view was that the nation’s ills stemmed from these two types of banking having become intertwined. Problems on Wall Street rippled through the financial system to cause ordinary depositors to lose money and ordinary bank lending to dry up.The government’s response was the Banking Act of 1933, commonly known as the Glass-Steagall Act (for the bill’s sponsors, Senator Carter Glass of Virginia and Representative Henry Steagall of Alabama), which required that commercial banking and securities activities be separated, not to take place within the same financial institution.Over the years, banks chafed at the limits on what businesses they could enter. The largest banks found themselves at a competitive disadvantage with banks from Europe that faced no such limitations and could offer both commercial and investment banking services to clients. Smaller banks in the United States wanted to begin offering investment management services.Bankers and many regulators argued that the risks Glass-Steagall aimed to guard against were overstated (and indeed regulators began allowing activity that violated the spirit of the law well before it was formally repealed). In 1999, Congress passed and Bill Clinton signed the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, overturning Glass-Steagall.The action allowed the rise of several very large banks in the United States with business lines that cut across both commercial lending and securities business, particularly Citigroup, JPMorgan Chase and Bank of America. Those three banks alone have combined assets of about $6.5 trillion, or 36 percent of the United States’ gross domestic product.Not exactly! In a popular retelling (see for example this version from Aaron Sorkin’s HBO show “Newsroom”), it was the repeal of Glass-Steagall that unleashed the era of Wall Street risk-taking and the 2008 global financial crisis.There’s no question that aggressive risk-taking by financial firms was a key driver of the crisis. But the arguments that Glass-Steagall’s repeal — that is, the commingling of investment banking and commercial banking within the same firm — was a major cause are tenuous.Of the big firms that got into trouble and helped trigger the crisis, only a few were the mega-banks enabled by Glass-Steagall Act.Bear Stearns, Lehman Brothers, Merrill Lynch, Goldman Sachs and Morgan Stanley were all traditional investment banks heading into the crisis. Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac were government-sponsored housing finance companies. A.I.G. was an insurance company. Some of the banks that were most aggressive about making subprime and other risky mortgage loans included Washington Mutual and Countrywide, both of which were organized as a savings and loan in the run-up to the crisis. Wachovia was a big commercial bank that had also gotten into the insurance and securities businesses — but it collapsed not because of those activities but because of its top-of-the-market acquisition of mortgage lender Golden West.It is true that two of the biggest bailout recipients were mega-banks with both commercial and investment banking arms, Citigroup and Bank of America. And while JPMorgan Chase and Wells Fargo weathered the crisis relatively well, they also accepted bailouts at the insistence of the Treasury and Federal Reserve in 2008.In other words, the mega-banks that were enabled by Glass-Steagall repeal were certainly among the firms that caused the crisis, and did require bailouts. It is less clear that they were meaningfully more culpable than companies whose structure had nothing to do with the Glass-Steagall repeal, or that the existence of both commercial banking and investment banking under the same corporate entity was a primary reason they got into trouble.The stronger arguments for Glass-Steagall repeal as a cause of the crisis are also subtler ones. The investment manager Barry Ritholtz, for example, has argued that “the repeal of Glass-Steagall may not have caused the crisis — but its repeal was a factor that made it much worse” by allowing the mid-2000s credit bubble to inflate larger than it otherwise would have and making banks more complex and thus prone to failure.The Dodd-Frank financial reform law in 2010 included a rule that aimed to reduce risky activity in mega-banks — in other words, to address some of the same vulnerabilities that Glass-Steagall was designed to prevent without breaking up the banks completely.The Volcker Rule, named for the former Fed chairman Paul Volcker, aims to prevent systemically important banks from engaging in casino-style trading activity. So, for example, Citigroup can still help a company issue bonds, but isn’t allowed to run an internal hedge fund in which traders place giant speculative bets on the direction of the Japanese yen.Shaping those rules has been a hard-fought battle between financial reform advocates and the banks, and Hillary Clinton has proposed toughening it, including by eliminating a provision of the Dodd-Frank Act that allows banks to invest in risky hedge funds.In other words, refinement of the Volcker Rule is a pathway for advocates of tougher limitations on banks’ risk-taking who do not want to break them up entirely.Glass-Steagall repeal is a useful cudgel for Bernie Sanders and Martin O’Malley to use against Hillary Clinton, not least because her husband signed the law that repealed it and because it is more instantly recognizable to many Democratic primary voters than, say, the tri-party repo market (a key part of the so-called shadow banking system that was one of the key transmission mechanisms for the 2008 crisis).It allows them a point of differentiation with Mrs. Clinton, whose financial reform plan, released last week, includes big new fees on the biggest banks and new powers for regulators to break them up, but does not propose breaking up big banks outright.In other words, the debate over Glass-Steagall reinstatement can be viewed as less about the gritty details of exactly what business lines Citigroup and JPMorgan should be allowed to engage in, and more about the general thrust of how aggressively to regulate Wall Street.As the 2016 presidential race begins to accelerate, debate and political opinion are abounding online. Your smartphone can help you control this flood of political news, as well as inform you about important facts.It’s hard to go online without taking part in some form of social interaction, and even political apps can connect users. Brigade — free on iOS — is an example of this sort of app. Brigade is a social network for discussing and informally voting on political issues like gun control, the environment and health care. The app is nicely designed, making it fairly easy to use, though I occasionally got lost in its menu system.Once you have signed up for a free profile, you can scan Brigade’s archive to find public votes on issues that interest you. Each issue is phrased in a way that users can agree or disagree with it, or choose unsure. Voting tallies are displayed as numbers and graphs. There is also a page where you and other users can write opinions about the issue. Users on this part of the app can, not surprisingly, become highly charged.Brigade users can also submit questions for others to vote on. And because the app is a social network, you can build a network of friends in it, though unfortunately, the app makes it seem a little as if friends are only those other users who agree with your opinions. If nothing else, Brigade is a great way to engage in political debate and gauge what issues people are talking about.When presidential candidates make references to constitutional matters, you may find yourself wanting to brush up on the Constitution. The iOS app Transcript of the United States Constitution, by Clifton Marien, is clear and simple. It contains a full copy of the text, shown in a clear and minimalist design. The text is easy to read and broken down into sections like the preamble, the articles and so on. You simply tap, scroll and read. And it is free.On Android, the free United States Constitution app by RBware not only offers a clean and plain text-based interface in which to read the famous document, but also a few extra features, including similar documents, like Magna Carta. And it has the option to jump to the Wikipedia pages for items in the app or to Google search for relevant websites.The Library of Congress has an official constitution app, free for iOS only, that has a more formal design and includes search features to find relevant sections easily. But several app store reviewers complained that the app was buggy, and I found it took a long time to download the text. Also, the text in the app is dense, making it difficult to read. So I’d recommend skipping this app. While the thousands of pages of analysis and insight can be interesting, it is not easy to use.If you’re seeking an app that consolidates political news, check out Politomix, free on iOS. The app says it scans 40 top political news sources and collects breaking news in one place when you activate it. The main interface lists the most recent news in a scrolling list, complete with thumbnail images, and you tap to read the ones that catch your eye.Politomix uses gestures to make it easy to scan quickly among stories, and if you want to read news from just one particular source, that’s possible, too. The app hasn’t been updated in a while, so sometimes text errors will appear, but overall, it seems to work well.A good alternative is the popular news-aggregating app Flipboard, which can be configured to show political news from many sources. Unlike Politomix, Flipboard is well maintained, so it’s more likely to work well on your device, and it has a more polished interface. Flipboard is free on iOS and Android, and it’s a fabulous tool for stemming the flood of political news arriving in your digital life.And don’t forget the official White House app, which is packed with easy-to-navigate news, briefings and videos from 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue. The app is well designed and free, so check it out on iOS and Android.Politics is divisive, so remember to be open-minded and stay calm when discussing it online. You never know — you might change your mind, or your vote.The independent podcast network Relay FM has released an app to give listeners access to its many different podcasts, which mostly have a technology bent. The app is visually great, and though it doesn’t give you full control of podcasts, lacking features like activating subscriptions, it’s a great way to stream recent podcasts from the network. Relay FM is free.When the Obama administration agreed this summer to erase the federal loan debt of some former students at Corinthian Colleges, a for-profit school that filed for bankruptcy in the face of charges of widespread fraud, education officials promised to “protect students from abusive colleges and safeguard the interests of taxpayers.”But the Education Department, despite a crackdown against what it calls “bad actors,” continues to hand over tens of millions of dollars every month to other for-profit schools that have been accused of predatory behavior, substandard practices or illegal activity by its own officials or state attorneys general across the country.Consider the Education Management Corporation, which runs 110 schools in the United States for chefs, artists and other trades. It has been investigated or sued in recent years by prosecutors in at least 12 states. The Justice Department has accused the company of illegally using incentives to pay its recruiters. And last year, investors filed a class-action lawsuit, contending that the company engaged in deceptive enrollment practices and manipulated federal student loan and grant programs.Education Management nonetheless received more than $1.25 billion in federal money over the last school year.The career training and for-profit college industry has been accused in recent years of preying on the poor, veterans and minorities by charging exorbitant fees for degrees that mostly fail to deliver promised skills and jobs.Despite stepped-up scrutiny, hundreds of schools that have failed regulatory standards or been accused of violating legal statutes are still hauling in billions of dollars of government funds. They include tiny beauty schools with staggering loan default rates and online law schools with dismal graduation records and no bar association accreditation. Without government funds, which account for the overwhelming bulk of revenue, few of these institutions could attract students or stay in business.The continuing flow of money illustrates the quandary facing federal education officials. On one hand, they have moved forcefully to try to protect taxpayer funds and prevent students from falling deeply into debt without anything to show for it. On the other, they must avoid running roughshod over private for-profit schools that have not been found guilty of wrongdoing. Agency officials point out that they cannot withhold money based on accusations, but must have proof of misconduct.For example, Education Management, which says it is cooperating with prosecutors, says it “strongly disagrees” with the Justice Department allegations.Regulators are caught between an industry that says it is being unfairly demonized by opponents and critics who complain not enough is being done to prevent fraud and abuse of vulnerable students. A Quandary  “For-profits successfully serve a lot of students, and the department has been very sensitive to having all students suffer for what may only affect some students in some programs,” said Kevin Kinser, an associate professor who studies for-profit colleges at the State University of New York at Albany. “So they are reluctant to throw the baby out with the bath water.”Mr. Kinser pointed out that the Education Department had little flexibility under the law when it came to cutting off federal student loan and grant money to potential abusers. “There are individual triggers in place for financial viability, institutional integrity, et cetera,” he said, “but no three-strikes-and-you’re-out rule.”Education officials say they have clamped down on many for-profit schools, restricting their ability to expand their programs or the number of campuses, capping the number of students eligible for student loans, or requiring schools like Education Management to post a letter of credit to gain access to federal student loans and grants. The letter is meant to protect students and taxpayers if the company is unable to cover federal student-aid liabilities.“What’s clear to all of us is that the best way to solve this problem is at the front end and not to let bad schools operate,” said Ted Mitchell, the under secretary of education. The agency’s “more aggressive stance,” he said, helped contribute to an 18 percent drop in enrollment at for-profits from 2011 to 2013.Still, critics say that even schools with egregious violations have become adept at exploiting loopholes, sidestepping rules or taking advantage of yearslong appeals processes. Companies with several campuses can pool graduation, financial, enrollment, staffing and other statistics to mask weak performers, experts say.“Bright-line standards are good, but they can also be managed,” said Ben Miller, senior director for postsecondary education at the Center for American Progress, a liberal research and advocacy group. “It’s why almost nobody gets caught. The big schools know how to work the numbers to avoid failing.”For example, the government can withhold student loan payments when a college’s default rate surpasses 30 percent three years in row — a signal that a school has a high dropout rate or that its students are not making sufficient income to pay back their loans. But several schools have figured out how to lower their rates by getting students temporary deferments or forbearances so they fall outside the three-year window.Nearly 100 schools have a student loan default rate that exceeds 30 percent. Last year, they received $116 million in federal aid from the Education Department.A new study by Adam Looney, of the Treasury Department, and Constantine Yannelis at Stanford University, found that since 2000, “most of the increase in default is associated with the rise in the number of borrowers at for-profit schools.” For-profit schools enroll about 12 percent of the nation’s college students, yet they account for nearly half of student loan defaults. Finding Problems  ITT Educational Services, which has about 138 campuses and 47,000 students, has been investigated or sued by 19 states, the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau and the Justice Department. Two of its campuses also failed to meet the Education Department’s standards for financial responsibility.Nonetheless, campuses flagged for problems by the department received more than $592 million in the 12-month period that ended June 30.In an email, Nicole Elam, a spokeswoman for ITT, wrote: “To date, not a single lawsuit has been filed by the multistate group of attorneys general naming ITT Tech.” In addition, ITT has called the S.E.C.’s charges “unfounded” and the consumer protection bureau’s case “unjustified.”“ITT Tech does help prospective students make informed decisions about enrollment through the disclosure of program cost, graduation and job placement rates, graduate salaries and loan debt,” Ms. Elam said.In recent years, more than two dozen companies that run for-profit colleges have been investigated or sued by state prosecutors. To handle the load, 37 state attorneys general have teamed up to form a working group. Together, the 152 schools under investigation received about $8.1 billion in federal student loan and grant payments last fiscal year, according to a detailed analysis by Mr. Miller for The New York Times, using data provided by the Education Department.One of those is Alta Colleges, partly owned by the Boston private equity firm Housatonic Partners. Alta, which operates campuses and an online division in several states, is being sued by the Illinois attorney general, who claims the colleges engaged  in “deceptive, unfair and abusive practices in the marketing and selling of their criminal justice program,” a three-year degree that costs $75,000, according to the complaint.Students were promised they would be primed for careers as police officers, sheriffs, corrections officers and FBI agents, but only 3.8 percent of graduates were actually employed as sworn law enforcement officers or correctional officers, the lawsuit states. The two most common jobs for graduates of the criminal justice program were as security guards or in retailing, positions that typically require only a high school or equivalency diploma. Alta schools received more than $104 million in federal aid in the last school year.Alta filed papers in court denying the allegations. The company did not return several phone calls seeking comment.Other schools under investigation complain they are the target of a witch hunt.Chris Hardman, senior vice president for communications at Education Management, said that the company was cooperating with prosecutors but that many of the investigations related to past recruiting practices.“We are dedicated to providing the opportunity for an education that, were it not for schools like ours, many of our students might never achieve,” Mr. Hardman said.Other schools, including Lincoln Technical Institute and Kaplan Career Institute in Massachusetts, have negotiated settlements with state prosecutors.Kaplan, which no longer runs any schools in Massachusetts, paid nearly $1.4 million, mostly used to pay down student loans, after being accused of misleading students with false information about its program and job placement and using “harassing sales tactics.”The parent company, Kaplan Higher Education settled another suit this year with the Justice Department, for $1.3 million, after being accused of employing unqualified instructors to teach its medical assistant courses in Texas.Neither Kaplan nor Lincoln admitted any wrongdoing.Kaplan’s schools, including its online California law school, where only one in five students graduates, received $776.3 million worth of federal student loans and grants last year. Because it lacks bar association accreditation, most graduates outside California are not allowed to take a bar exam.“These schools exist on the back of U.S. taxpayers,” Maura Healey, the Massachusetts attorney general, said. “It’s time to turn off the spigot of federal student loan that are flowing into these for-profit colleges.”“They absolutely have the authority today” to cut off funds, Ms. Healey said, arguing that the federal government could rely on findings by the state attorneys general, among other evidence of abuse.So far more than 3,000 former Corinthian students have successfully petitioned the Education Department to erase their college loan debt because their school closed. Thousands more from Corinthian have asked for relief.Education officials met with advocates at the White House last month, to discuss whether the agency could act more quickly to cut off access to federal funds when there were warning signs of bad behavior, according to a participant.The Defense Department recently barred the University of Phoenix, one of the largest for-profit schools, from participating in its tuition assistance program for active-duty troops or from recruiting on military bases. The Pentagon cited investigations begun by the Federal Trade Commission and the California attorney general.Although for-profit schools are prohibited from receiving more than 90 percent of their revenue from the federal government, military benefits such as the Pentagon’s tuition-assistance program and the G.I. Bill are not counted toward that sum, a loophole that has infuriated critics.David Halperin, a Washington lawyer who tracks investigations against for-profits, has taken federal officials to task for not moving more aggressively against schools with long records of complaints.“The Department of Education has declared Corinthian Colleges a disaster area in need of a big taxpayer bailout, yet the department continues to send billions of dollars to other for-profit colleges that are deceiving and abusing students in the same ways Corinthian did,” he said. Warning Signs  A formal investigation is only one of the serious warning signs that a college may be engaging in abusive practices or financial shenanigans, prosecutors, officials and advocates say.There are 98 for-profit schools on the Education Department’s financial responsibility watch list, which Mr. Mitchell, the under secretary, has described as a “caution light.” They received roughly $600 million in the last year.And 35 for-profit schools have been subjected to the department’s most stringent financial sanctions, which limit access to federal money in advance. Inclusion on this list can be another signal that there are regulatory problems, sometimes serious, relating to accreditation, financial statements and audits, liabilities or denial of certifications. Last year, these schools received more than $15 million.Education advocates have also accused the Education Department of not more aggressively policing for-profit schools that convert to nonprofits as a way of sidestepping federal regulations. A report released last week by The Century Foundation concluded: “The owners of some for-profit institutions have sought to switch their schools to nonprofit status, freeing them from the regulatory burdens of for-profit colleges, while continuing to reap the personal financial benefits of for-profit ownership.”Mr. Mitchell said that a new regulation that went into effect this summer would add a powerful weapon to the agency’s arsenal of sanctions. Known as the gainful employment rule, it measures whether graduates of for-profit vocational programs as well as nondegree programs at community colleges earn enough to pay off student loans.The Obama administration, which sent officials on the road last month to promote his plan for free community college, has estimated that 99 percent of the 1,400 programs likely to fail under the new rules are run by for-profit schools. The industry has fiercely fought this new regulation; Democrats and Republicans in Congress have introduced legislation to roll it back.Mr. Mitchell also criticized state accreditation agencies for not more aggressively monitoring substandard institutions.“The fact that Corinthian was accredited through the day of its bankruptcy,” Mr. Mitchell said, “shows that there’s a lot of work to do through quality assurance.”BlackRock, the fund management giant, on Wednesday reported an inflow of money to its main investment funds in the third quarter even as investors reacted to volatile swings in stock and bond markets.As the world’s largest publicly quoted money manager and the leading provider of exchange-traded funds — the mutual fund industry’s fastest growing investment vehicle — BlackRock’s financial performance is being closely watched by market participants.The company said on Wednesday that earnings for the third quarter on an adjusted basis declined 5 percent, to $844 million, or $5 a share, from $890 million, or $5.21 a share, in the quarter a year ago.The muted results reflect today’s very uncertain investment performance. As stock and bond markets swooned in August and September, many investors pulled their money out in the hope of riding out the storm.Nevertheless, BlackRock was able to report net investment flows of $50 billion, driven by $23 billion moving into its exchange-traded funds called iShares. In the second quarter, the firm had net investment outflows of $7.3 billion.Overall assets under management, the most crucial gauge for investment managers, fell to $4.5 trillion at the end of September from $4.7 trillion at the end of June.Assets in the firm’s main profit driver — exchange-traded funds — were $1 trillion at the end of the quarter, mostly flat from the quarter that ended in June and up from $975 billion a year ago.“Despite all the insecurities in the market, we had $50 billion in growth,” said Laurence D. Fink, BlackRock’s chief executive officer. “We can’t control world markets, but because of our diverse range of products, we are in a very good position.”Mr. Fink also addressed some of the criticisms leveled at the exchange-traded funds industry after the events of Aug. 24, when the prices of a number of the funds fell sharply relative to their underlying assets.Several industry participants have said the price dislocations should be seen as a warning for the sector, which has absorbed enormous fund inflows in the past four years.“We didn’t have the problem — this was a market structure problem,” Mr. Fink said. “It was a big event, but 90 minutes later, everything was fine.”Moreover, he pointed out, inflows into exchange-traded funds have only increased since that day.Addressing the broader state of the markets, Mr. Fink, who was in Lima, Peru, last week for the fall meetings of the International Monetary Fund, said he sensed an easing of the persistent gloom that has affected global markets recently.In particular, he cited public comments from senior Chinese officials that there would not be a second, larger devaluation of the renminbi.“That was the biggest risk — that there would be another Chinese devaluation,” Mr. Fink said. “I think that the markets will rally between now and year end.”Compared with other money managers like Pimco and Franklin Templeton, which have had substantial investor outflows because of their heavy exposures to volatile international markets, BlackRock has performed better.Seeking safety from plunging bond and equity markets, investors piled into the company’s exchange-traded funds that invest in safer securities like United States Treasury bills.Exchange-traded funds are investment vehicles that track a certain bond or stock index but trade like stocks, allowing investors to buy and sell them on a whim.SAN FRANCISCO — The Intel Corporation is changing with the times.Intel became the world’s biggest producer of semiconductors thanks mostly to personal computers, which eventually led to chips for server computers.Now, the new hot trend of cloud computing — data centers filled with tightly connected servers — is remaking Intel.On Tuesday, Intel, based in Santa Clara, Calif., said that in the three months that ended Sept. 26, PC chips brought in $8.5 billion and chips for servers in cloud computing data centers brought in $4.1 billion. A year ago, PC chips brought in $9.2 billion and data center chips brought in $3.7 billion.The shifting businesses at Intel reflect broader changes in the computing industry, and what Intel chooses to focus on can affect the choices of many other companies.PC sales are in a long decline, as customers increasingly use online services connected to mobile devices. While Microsoft and others try to revive the market with new designs and tabletlike models, in the most recent quarter worldwide PC shipments fell 10.8 percent from the year before, according to IDC.Making PC chips is still a big business, but not the way it once was. The data center group also has much higher profit margins: Operating profit from PC chips was $2.1 billion, down 20 percent from a year ago, while data center chips had an operating profit of $2.1 billion, up 9 percent.That matters, because Intel is already stressing products in networking and advanced cloud systems, to feed the profitability of cloud systems as PCs continue to wane. That means cloud computing leaders like Amazon and Google could benefit even more, and expand their online operations.Having missed much of the market for chips in mobile devices, Intel is also investing in sensors for devices connected to cloud systems.“If you zoom out, we’re not a PC company anymore,” Stacy J. Smith, Intel’s chief financial officer, said in an interview. “We still work with PC companies, but we’re deeply involved in automotive, wearables, all kinds of new devices.”Last month, Intel even sponsored Fashion Week in New York, stressing the convergence of clothing and computing.Intel’s net income for the third quarter was 64 cents a share, above the projections of Wall Street analysts. According to a survey by Thomson Reuters, analysts thought Intel would make 59 cents a share, down from 66 cents a year ago. Revenue was $14.5 billion, down slightly from $14.6 billion a year ago, and above projections of $14.2 billion.Intel shares were down about 3.5 percent in after-hours trading, in part because of a projected fourth-quarter dip in demand from cloud companies.“The Intel story has become a tale of two divisions,” said Bill Kreher, an analyst with Edward Jones. “Data centers show incredible headway. There will come a time soon when it will outweigh PC chips.”That doesn’t mean doom for Intel, as the unexpected profitability suggests. All those connected devices increasingly talk with companies that use cloud computing technology and Intel makes most of the chips that go into the servers in the data centers of cloud systems.It does mean Intel has to work hard to be a different company.“About 30 percent of our server business is now to cloud companies, and growing at a fast clip,” said Diane Bryant, head of Intel’s data center group, in a recent interview. “It’s the new opportunity for our revenue stream.”Intel is trying to enter the mobile business and sensors too, so far with little impact. The shift to more data center chips means lots of things will change for Intel, not least the kinds of customers it works with.Intel’s mix of cloud-computing customers shows how much influence is wielded by just a handful of big operations. Of 200 cloud company customers that Intel tracks, just seven take one-third of those chips: Google, Amazon Web Services, Microsoft and Facebook, as well as Baidu, Alibaba and Tencent of China.While the rest are now growing at twice the rate of the top seven, Ms. Bryant said, the big companies are unusually demanding customers, even designing their own chip modifications to make their global clouds work better.“More and more of them have custom microprocessors from us,” she said. “What is really different is the pace of their market. They deploy our next-generation processors six months before we formally launch them, buying tens of thousands of chips that they ship to themselves.”In addition, from all the cloud companies 80 percent of every new major purchase is for a more powerful chip. The newer and more powerful chips tend to have even higher profit margins, and also spur Intel to develop new things faster. Last week Amazon announced it would soon have Intel’s most powerful chip available in its cloud.The changes come while Intel’s traditional customers undergo their own radical changes. On Monday Dell, a big maker of servers and PCs, announced it was buying the data storage giant EMC. On Nov. 2, the server and storage businesses of Hewlett-Packard will split off from its PC business, in what top executives hope is a move for a faster-moving business.Intel may also face new competitors in the cloud business. Last week Qualcomm, a major producer of chips for smartphones, announced a big move into chips that work well in cloud systems.Dish Network, the satellite television provider, has urged regulators to reject a pair of deals proposed by its rival Charter Communications totaling $67.1 billion, saying they would “significantly damage” competition and limit consumer access to online video.The company, in a petition filed Tuesday with the Federal Communications Commission, said that Charter’s proposed takeover of Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks would be “no better for the public interest” than Comcast’s failed $45 billion deal for Time Warner Cable, which collapsed under regulatory scrutiny earlier this year.When Comcast tried to acquire Time Warner Cable, regulators found that the combined company would have had both the power and the incentive to harm online video competition. Dish Network, which also opposed the Comcast-Time Warner Cable deal, said the new deal should lead regulators to the same conclusion because of the combined company’s control over broadband.If Charter’s deal is approved, the tie-up would create a new force in the country’s video and broadband market with about 24 million customers in 41 states. The company would control about 30 percent of the country’s high-speed Internet market and 17 percent of video subscribers.In its filing, Dish cited the potential for the combined company to harm its new Sling TV video service, which offers streaming television without a traditional cable or satellite subscription.The proposed merger “would cause significant and irreparable harm to emerging competitive online video products and services, as well as the performance of traditional satellite television service, ultimately reducing competition and choice for consumers,” Roger Lynch, chief executive of Sling TV, stated in an accompanying filing. “Accordingly, I believe that the merger as currently constructed is not in the public interest and should be denied.”Charter Communications has argued that its deals would pose no threat to the online video market because its future depends more on broadband than on its legacy video business.“There is no more friendly broadband provider to Sling than Charter,” Justin Venech, a Charter spokesman, said in a statement. “Charter’s slowest speed is 60 Mbps. We have no data caps, no contracts and no modem fees.”Also on Tuesday, AT&T; asked regulators in a filing to carefully review the transaction to consider how cable consolidation could affect coordination between cable operators against emerging competition. Public interest groups like Public Knowledge, Common Cause, Consumers Union and Open Media and Information Companies Initiative urged regulators to reject the deal.To date, Charter’s proposed acquisitions have received significantly less criticism than Comcast’s deal for Time Warner Cable, which would have united the two largest cable operators in the country. Several state and local representatives, local chambers of commerce and nonprofit organizations have submitted regulatory filings supporting Charter’s deal.On Tuesday, when Max Schrems won a landmark privacy case in the European Court of Justice, Edward J. Snowden told him on Twitter that he had “changed the world for the better.” Penny Pritzker, the United States commerce secretary, had a different opinion, saying the decision “puts at risk the thriving trans-Atlantic digital economy.” The brouhaha, however, had little evident effect on the apparently imperturbable Mr. Schrems.“I expected this,” said Mr. Schrems, a 28-year-old graduate student in law at the University of Vienna who, for the formal reading of the decision, wore jeans and an untucked button-down shirt. “Under the law they couldn’t say anything else.”For all of Mr. Schrems’s certainty, few privacy lawyers expected such a sweeping decision. The case concerned the transfer of the personal data between Europe and the United States, a complex, previously obscure issue that nonetheless has significant consequences for most companies that send personal information — via activities like searches, social media postings and online purchases — across the Atlantic.The decision invalidated the so-called safe harbor agreement under which more than 4,000 American companies, including Google and Facebook, were handling the personal data of European consumers. Those companies can find other ways to transfer this information legally, but the court’s decision seems to empower the national regulators in each of the 28 European Union countries to investigate whether data transferred to the United States is protected adequately. And some of those regulators have a dim view of Silicon Valley’s attitude toward privacy.Mr. Schrems’s legal campaign against Facebook began when he was a 24-year-old student studying at the Santa Clara University School of Law in California. Over the course of the semester, a couple of lawyers from Silicon Valley technology companies came to speak to his privacy class, and Mr. Schrems was taken aback to hear them say they didn’t take Europe’s strict privacy laws very seriously, since companies rarely faced significant penalties for breaking them.At the time, Mr. Schrems was looking for a topic for a paper. “I had to write about something,” he said recently. So he decided to look at how Facebook deals with European data protection laws. Those laws limit how companies collect personal information, prohibit them from using it for unauthorized purposes without permission and restrict how they handle it.Mr. Schrems sent Facebook a formal request to see all of the data the company had collected about him, which he has the right to do under European law. After a couple of weeks and about a dozen emails, he received a CD by mail with more than 1,200 pages of information — every “poke,” friend request and invitation (and response) he had sent since setting up an account in 2008. Most of it was no surprise, but he was shocked to see that Facebook had retained information he had deleted — and was no longer visible online — including the complete text of a private chat with a friend who had been hospitalized for psychological problems. (Facebook has said an individual can delete only his side of a correspondence.) “Her health history is in these messages,” Mr. Schrems said, “and I deleted them, but they were still there.”Mr. Schrems doesn’t object to Facebook, and he still uses his account. “We should be able to use all of these services,” he said, “but there has to be a line.” So he filed 22 complaints about data retention and some of the company’s other privacy practices with the Irish Data Protection Commissioner, which regulates Facebook, because its European operations are based in Ireland. Two years later, after Mr. Snowden revealed that the National Security Agency could gain access to the personal information of Europeans held by American technology companies through the Prism program, Mr. Schrems filed another complaint, asserting that Facebook couldn’t transfer his personal information to the United States, since it wasn’t adequately protected there. The regulator rejected this petition.This eventually became the European Court of Justice case decided last week. The court ruled that national regulators can investigate whether data transfers comply with European law, but also, crucially, that the safe harbor agreement was itself invalid. (Facebook issued a statement on Tuesday saying that the case was about United States surveillance and that “Facebook has done nothing wrong.”) The ruling is also expected to complicate negotiations for a new trans-Atlantic data-transfer agreement, as well as new European data-protection legislation.American technology firms are especially worried because they routinely transfer so much information across the Atlantic. “International data transfers are the lifeblood of the digital economy,” said Townsend Feehan, chief executive of IAB Europe, which represents online advertising companies including Google as well as small start-ups. The ruling “brings with it significant uncertainty as to the future possibility for such transfers.”As Mr. Schrems sees it, however, what is at stake is a deeper conflict between the European legal view of privacy as a right equivalent to free speech and that of the United States, where consumers are asked to read and agree to a company’s terms of service and decide what’s best for themselves. “We only do this in the privacy field — dump all the responsibility on the user,” Mr. Schrems said. He pointed out that consumers are not expected to make decisions about other complex issues, like food or building safety. “In a civilized society,” he said, “you expect that if you walk into a building it’s not going to collapse on your head.”“I’m not a big privacy person,” Mr. Schrems told me in May over brunch at the Naschmarkt, a hip outdoor market in Vienna. That’s fortunate, since his activism has had the paradoxical effect of making him a public figure in Germany and Austria — he’s even appeared on the cover of the German tabloid Bild-Zeitung. Analytical by nature, Mr. Schrems is more interested in privacy in principle than in practice; he says he’s not hiding anything but that he wants to be able to decide what he shares with whom. He doesn’t tell most journalists he is gay, information he volunteered in an interview, for example, “because then people think you only want to keep things private because you’re gay.”However much people want to hold on to their privacy, they nonetheless inadvertently reveal all sorts of things when they go online, including habits, sexual orientation and political beliefs. Data gathered online is sometimes sold, shared or combined with information from mobile phones or offline sources. All of this information is a vital raw material for a digital advertising business expected to be worth more than $80 billion worldwide by 2018.“Surveillance,” wrote Bruce Schneier, a leading computer security analyst, “is the business model of the Internet.” Big Brother is no longer the only threat to privacy, and Europe has struggled to regulate the gossipy circle of consumer-data-collecting companies. Facebook currently faces challenges from five European regulators, including a Dutch-led investigation into how the company uses data from services like Instagram and WhatsApp and a Belgian effort to stop it from tracking consumers who have not joined the service.Mr. Schrems, lawmakers and various regulators are essentially asking why consumers don’t have more control over the information gathered by their computers and phones — and perhaps soon by their smartwatches and self-driving cars. “This is something we see as a fundamental value,” Mr. Schrems said. To drive home the analogy for an American, he put it this way: “You can’t say, ‘Oh, I don’t feel like applying the First Amendment.’ ”Mr. Schrems first became interested in privacy when he spent a year as an exchange student in Avon Park, a town in central Florida. It was quite a shock for a 16-year-old from cosmopolitan Salzburg, Austria’s fourth-largest city. “Everyone was deeply religious, everyone was Republican,” Mr. Schrems said. He remembers being surprised at the level of security in his high school, which had video cameras mounted in the hallway.Like many young, well-educated Europeans, Mr. Schrems likes the United States, but he objects to the tendency of Silicon Valley companies to beg forgiveness rather than ask permission. “The approach of the big companies is saying we’re above the law,” he said. Not for nothing does he call his organization — which consists mostly of him and some university friends — Europe-v-Facebook.One reason European countries take privacy so seriously is that it’s technically considered two rights. The Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union guarantees the right to “respect for private and family life” and also, separately, that “everyone has the right to the protection of personal data concerning him or her.” It also says that data protection laws must be overseen by independent regulators, which is why national data protection authorities in Europe have so much power.“Data protection is a right to determine how — rather than whether — one participates in sharing information,” says Viktor Mayer-Schönberger, a professor at the Oxford Internet Institute who writes on these issues. That distinction is important: Data protection doesn’t just protect information individuals don’t want to share; it also gives them some control over information that companies have already gathered. Like every right, it has limits. But “it’s intended to give individuals control over every phase and stage of the use of their personal information,” he said.The concept of data protection as distinct from privacy only dates back to the late 1960s, when computers and databases became more sophisticated. With memories of World War II-era fascism still relatively fresh, European countries began passing data-protection laws in the 1970s. In 1983, the German Federal Constitutional Court recognized an individual’s right to control information about himself as “informationelle selbstbestimmung,” or “informational self-determination,” a phrase that sounds very German even after translating it into English.To American lawyers, “informational self-determination” can sound more like literary theory than law. And even some Europeans see data protection laws as based on confusing logic and overseen by old-fashioned bureaucracies that can complicate everyday tasks without offering an effective way to stop truly bad actors.But Continental European law recognizes a concept of personal dignity, which includes privacy and reputation, that needs to be respected. That’s why the European Court of Justice last year recognized the so-called right to be forgotten, which lets individuals seek removal of search engine links to information about them that’s “inadequate, irrelevant or no longer relevant.”To Mr. Schrems, the debate in the United States that arose out of the Snowden leaks was centered on the question of security — keeping information out of the hands of others. In technology circles, that discussion often revolves around encryption and other technical solutions that put the onus on individuals to protect themselves, a popular idea in libertarian-leaning Silicon Valley that doesn’t play as well in Europe.“Encryption is based to some extent on the idea that the law won’t protect your rights, so you have to protect yourself,” says Karl-Nikolaus Peifer, director of the Institute for Media Law and Communications Law of the University of Cologne. “The European tradition is that the law will protect you.”Two days after I met Mr. Schrems in Vienna, I watched him give a short speech at an International Bar Association conference at the Savoy Hotel in London.He looked distinctly out of place amid all the lawyers in suits. But they listened intently as he discussed Facebook’s terms of service and showed charts illustrating how much data Facebook collects. He even got laughs — and a few gasps — when delivering his punch line: A slide with a picture of a Centra minimart in the Irish countryside. “This is the Irish Data Protection Commissioner who is in charge of Facebook, Dropbox, LinkedIn, Google — all the big names,” he says. “It’s in a cool place called Portarlington with about 5,000 people.” The Irish Data Protection Commissioner has its office — pause — “there,” Schrems said, pointing to the floor above the market. (The organization moved some of its operations to Dublin this year.) Imagine if the Federal Trade Commission had its headquarters above a 7-Eleven in a Virginia exurb and you’ll get the idea.The Irish Data Protection Commissioner never responded to Mr. Schrems’s original 22 complaints to his satisfaction, so in 2014 he filed a class-action-style case in Austria that was dismissed for jurisdictional reasons. Mr. Schrems appealed. Perhaps most important, however, Mr. Schrems’s original complaints helped inspire the forthcoming European Union data protection legislation. “He was actually the trigger for me to understand that we couldn’t continue the way the law was applied,” said Viviane Reding, the former European Union justice commissioner who proposed the law and is now a member of the European Parliament.The current version of the legislation calls for a “one-stop-shop” system in which American companies would be regulated primarily by the data protection authority of the country in which their European headquarters were in. But the court’s decision could make that untenable.Silicon Valley companies have said they are continuing to transfer data by other legal means, and negotiations on a new safe harbor agreement are continuing. But the court’s decision will make that difficult, and it seems to open the door for national regulators to investigate any of those transfers, which could cause significant headaches for technology companies. Final decisions, made by the European Court of Justice, would be based on corporate behavior, including, potentially, whether companies were cooperating with the N.S.A. American technology companies could also move some operations to Europe, thus avoiding the need to transfer data across the Atlantic.“There’s a massive tension between the libertarian values of Silicon Valley, which is focused on innovation, and the 28 national regulators focused on the rules and regulations of privacy as a human right,” said J. Trevor Hughes, chief executive of the International Association of Privacy Professionals, which has taken no position on the case. “We’ll be watching for what the regulators do.”Bank of America’s profit surged in the third quarter, although revenue declined from a year ago, as the bank struggled with volatile interest rates and choppy trading markets.The Charlotte, N.C.-based bank said on Wednesday that it earned $4.5 billion in the third quarter compared with the quarter a year ago, when it reported a loss of $232 million resulting from giant mortgage-related legal expenses. On a per-share basis, Bank of America’s third-quarter profit was 37 cents a share, higher than the 33 cents a share that analysts had expected, according to Thomson Reuters.Revenue, however, fell 2.4 percent, to $20.9 billion, from the quarter a year ago, and was a bit shy of analysts’ estimates.Still, investors focused on the improvements. In premarket trading, shares of Bank of America were up more than 2 percent.“The key drivers of our business — deposit-taking and lending to both our consumer and corporate clients — moved in the right direction this quarter and our trading results on behalf of clients remained fairly stable in challenging capital markets conditions,” Brian T. Moynihan, the bank’s chairman and chief executive, said in a statement.Mr. Moynihan is under pressure from investors to demonstrate that he can lead the bank to a series of profitable quarters after years of lackluster results, regulatory stumbles and legal troubles stemming from the financial crisis.Last month, Mr. Moynihan easily won a shareholder vote on a proposal that would have stripped him of his chairman post. The vote was seen by some as partly a referendum on the company’s performance. The bank’s stock has lagged those of other large banks and is down 13 percent since the start of the year.The third-quarter results were bolstered by a 4 percent decline in expenses, lower charge-offs on loans and increases in fees from mortgage lending. The bank originated $13.7 billion in mortgages in the third quarter up from $11.7 billion a year ago,In the second quarter, when profits more than doubled from a year earlier, bank executives heralded the surge as the beginning of more lucrative and stable earnings. But one reason for the stellar earnings was an accounting treatment that increases the value of the bank’s mortgage bond investment when interest rates rise.In the most recent quarter, that accounting treatment worked in reverse, causing the value of those investment to fall, as certain interest rates dropped.Bank of America’s results follow a rough third quarter at JPMorgan Chase, which kicked off earnings season on Tuesday evening. JPMorgan reported that revenue fell in virtually all of its business units and at a sharper pace than analysts had expected.Like JPMorgan, Bank of America suffered declines in its fixed-income trading unit, with revenue falling 11 percent after excluding one-time debt adjustments. Declines in credit trading revenue were a big factor behind the drop, Bank of America said.The king of beers is sizing up an even bigger crown.The world’s largest brewer, Anheuser-Busch InBev, maker of Budweiser and Stella Artois, struck an agreement in principle on Tuesday to acquire its closest rival, SABMiller, for about $104 billion.The deal — creating a behemoth in the beer industry with annual revenue of about $64 billion — is expected to garner extensive regulatory scrutiny given the size of the combined company and its potential dominance in several markets worldwide, including the United States.The agreement came after weeks of back and forth between the two companies, and just before a deadline on Wednesday that would have required Anheuser-Busch InBev to make what is considered a formal offer under British takeover rules or not make another approach for up to six months.Behind the scenes, shareholders of the two companies had been holding their own sets of talks. Over the weekend, representatives of 3G Capital, the Brazilian investment firm that helped create Anheuser, held discussions with the Santo Domingo family, which owns 14 percent of SABMiller, according to people briefed on the matter. The Colombian family is also an investor in 3G.It was 3G that had negotiated with SABMiller’s other big shareholder, the American tobacco giant Altria, which holds a 27 percent stake, and secured its support for a takeover. Having the Brazilians handle the negotiations with a fellow South American beer dynasty made sense, given the Santo Domingos’ close ties to 3G.By Sunday night, Alejandro Santo Domingo, the 38-year-old scion of his clan and one of the family’s two representatives on the SABMiller board, had agreed to a price of £43.50, these people said.Having won over a shareholder critical for any deal, Carlos Brito, the Anheuser-Busch InBev chief executive, and Olivier Goudet, the Anheuser-Busch chairman, flew to London from New York to meet with Jan du Plessis, the SABMiller chairman, Monday morning, people briefed on the discussions said.In the unassuming brick offices of an SABMiller adviser — the boutique investment bank Robey Warshaw — the men held a series of face-to-face meetings to try to negotiate a deal. Mr. Goudet had not joined previous in-person meetings between Anheuser-Busch and SABMiller, these people said.SABMiller was not only seeking a high premium for its shareholders, but it wanted assurances that a deal could be completed, seeking a commitment from Anheuser-Busch InBev that it would undertake its “best efforts” to obtain the necessary regulatory approvals, these people said. By mid-evening, the talks concluded with a handshake agreement in place.On Tuesday, SABMiller said its board, including representatives from both Altria and the Santo Domingo family, was prepared “unanimously to recommend” the offer, subject to an agreement on other terms and conditions.British regulators agreed to extend the deadline for two weeks to Oct. 28, so that Anheuser-Busch InBev and SABMiller could continue their talks. The two sides hope to have a definitive merger agreement in place by then.In London trading on Tuesday, shares of SABMiller closed up more than 9 percent, at £39.48.A merger would bring some of the world’s most popular beers under one roof, including Budweiser, Corona and Stella Artois from Anheuser-Busch InBev, and Grolsch, Peroni Nastro Azzurro and Pilsner Urquell from SABMiller.The deal would also give Anheuser-Busch InBev more exposure to faster-growing emerging markets, particularly in Africa and Latin America.The research firm Euromonitor International estimated on Tuesday that the combined Anheuser-Busch InBev-SABMiller would account for 29 percent of global beer sales, after selling assets to win regulatory approval. It also would be more than three times as large in terms of sales as its next closest competitor, the Dutch brewer Heineken, according to Euromonitor.“With all the major M.&A.; targets now taken, and M.&A.; so important to brewers’ growth, it raises the question of where next for global brewers as they bid to carry on growing,” said Jeremy Cunnington, a senior analyst for alcoholic drinks at Euromonitor.As part of its latest proposal, Anheuser-Busch InBev also agreed to pay a $3 billion fee to SABMiller in the event that the deal failed to receive regulatory approval, the companies said.To win over regulators, the brewers may be forced to sell off some assets where they overlap, including the United States.Analysts said it was likely that the United States Justice Department would seek the breakup or sale of SABMiller’s holdings in MillerCoors, the joint venture that it formed with Molson Coors in 2008 to combine their United States operations. That partnership owns several major brands in the United States, including Miller Lite, Coors Light and Blue Moon.Under the terms of the joint venture, Molson Coors has the right to make the first offer and match the last for SABMiller’s stake in the joint venture, should it choose to sell. Molson Coors also could save hundreds of millions of dollars in costs by taking full control of the partnership, according to analysts.Another hurdle could be China, where SABMiller holds a 49 percent stake in a joint venture that owns Snow, China’s best-selling beer brand. China Resources Enterprise, its joint venture partner, would be a likely buyer, according to analysts.“Anheuser-Busch InBev and SABMiller will have to spend many months convincing regulators in the U.S., Europe, China and Latin America that this is a good deal for beer drinkers,” said Brian J.M. Quinn, a law professor at Boston College Law School.Anheuser-Busch InBev itself was required to restructure its $20.1 billion takeover of Grupo Modelo of Mexico in 2013 after the Justice Department sued to block that deal. Among the concessions at the time, Anheuser-Busch InBev agreed to sell the rights to Corona beer and other Grupo Modelo brands in the United States to Constellation Brands, one of the world’s largest wine companies, for $2.9 billion.Anheuser-Busch InBev was created seven years ago in a move orchestrated by 3G Capital, Anheuser-Busch InBev’s largest shareholder. The founding partners of 3G used AmBev, their Brazilian company, to merge with InterBrew of Belgium and then orchestrate a surprise takeover of Anheuser-Busch, in 2008.The company, 3G, also has been the driving force behind the combination of Burger King with the Canadian doughnut chain Tim Hortons into a new company, Restaurant Brands International, in 2014, and the merger of Kraft Foods and Heinz earlier this year.Under the terms of the latest proposal, Anheuser-Busch InBev is offering to pay 44 pounds, or about $67, a share for SABMiller. That is up from an offer of £43.50 a share in cash made on Monday, and it would represent more than a 50 percent premium to SABMiller’s closing price in mid-September, before Anheuser-Busch InBev’s approach was first announced.As part of the deal, Altria and the Santo Domingo family’s BevCo would receive restricted shares and a smaller amount of cash at £39.03 a share, a discount to the cash price. Under that proposal, they would receive 0.483969 of a restricted share and £3.78 a share in cash for each share they hold in SABMiller.As a result, Anheuser-Busch InBev would probably pay £67.9 billion.By accepting shares and remaining invested in the combined company, Altria and BevCo would avoid the large tax bills they would incur if they sold their entire holdings.The proposal also included a possibility for SABMiller shareholders to receive dividends ahead of the deal’s completion, up to $1.22 a share.Condé Nast, the publisher that owns magazines like Vogue and Vanity Fair, said on Tuesday that it had acquired Pitchfork Media, the company behind the independent music website and quarterly magazine, for an undisclosed sum.Pitchfork, founded in 1995, has long been one of music’s independent voices, known for unearthing up-and-coming artists, and for its in-depth reviews. The acquisition will take immediate effect.It gives Condé Nast a stand-alone music publication with a strong editorial voice, said Fred Santarpia, the company’s chief digital officer, who led the acquisition. It brings “a very passionate audience of millennial males into our roster,” he said.Pitchfork, he said, is profitable, and it boasts a thriving live events business, with events in Chicago and Paris, and robust video offerings — both vital and growing parts of the publishing business. He declined to say how much Condé Nast paid. The quarterly print magazine, The Pitchfork Review, will continue, Mr. Santarpia said.“Pitchfork is incredibly fortunate to have found in Condé Nast a team of people who share our commitment to editorial excellence,” Ryan Schreiber, Pitchfork’s founder and chief executive, said in a statement. “Their belief in what we do, combined with their additional expertise and resources, will allow us to extend our coverage of the artists and stories that shape the music landscape on every platform.”In an email to its staff, Condé Nast’s chief executive, Bob Sauerberg, said the deal “reinforces our commitment to building Condé Nast’s premium digital network, focusing on distinctive editorial voices and engaging high-value millennial audiences.”The logic of investing in index funds has so far seemed simple and compelling for growing numbers of people.Why spend the time researching individual securities and run the risk of choosing the wrong stock in the wrong sector when you can simply buy the market as a whole? Put your money in an exchange-traded fund, or E.T.F., or in a traditional mutual fund that passively tracks a stock index like the Standard & Poor’s 500 or the Russell 2000 and you have instant diversification without the risk of error in security analysis. The fees for such funds are typically very low, too. And E.T.F.s are traded all day, making for easy entry and exit.But if you look closely at such funds, as several scholars and analysts have done, you may find that their simplicity harbors some simmering problems, which have grown more troubling in the course of the bull market in stocks.Stocks in the Russell 2000 seem especially bloated in valuation when compared with non-index peers. S&P; Capital IQ compared the valuation of stocks within that index to stocks of similar market capitalization that are not in the index. It used a common valuation metric, the ratio of stock price-to-book value. It found that the valuation gap between stocks in the index, and those outside it, had swollen enormously. That could make investing in the index a riskier proposition than is widely understood.Nonetheless, the popularity of index-tracking funds is unquestionable. They now account for over 30 percent of all stock and bond mutual fund and exchange-traded fund assets under management, according to Morningstar.But cracks in the edifice of passive investing are beginning to show. While investing in index funds may still make a good deal of sense, it’s important to understand some of the funds’ pitfalls.The August downturn, for example, featured multiple E.T.F. trading halts that suggested the funds are not easy to get out of in periods of high volatility. For the month as a whole, index stocks, especially those in the Russell 2000, also sold off a bit more sharply than non-index stocks, notes James Xiong, head of quantitative research at Morningstar. And both during and before the correction, index stocks moved together with a high enough correlation to call diversification claims into question.Most disturbing, though, is the increasingly distorted levels of the valuations of some of the largest index funds. The combination of a long-toothed bull market and the significant shift to passive investing has indiscriminately buoyed all stocks in major indexes like the S.&P.; 500 and the Russell 2000. Stocks that might not be bought singly on their own merits have been lifted by the package buying. Some portfolio managers, academics and market trackers now contend that the soaring of the mediocre alongside the exceptional has produced unusually elevated valuations.The existence of a valuation premium for stocks newly included in index funds has long been known, of course. On average, from 1990 to 2005, when a stock was added to the S.&P.; 500 — effectively requiring many investors to hold the stock for the first time — the mere inclusion added almost 9 percent to share prices, according to Jeffrey Wurgler, a professor of finance at New York University.And it’s possible that, to some degree at least, stocks that are included in index funds are chosen precisely because their prospects are better and they deserve a higher valuation. In addition, another factor behind the current high valuations of stocks in the indexes is that investors have generally favored large-cap stocks in the current bull market, and the S.&P.; 500 and Russell 2000 track such stocks.Even so, current valuations for stocks in the S.&P.; 500 and Russell 2000 have soared well beyond what might otherwise be expected, some analysts and portfolio managers say.According to the calculations of S&P; Capital IQ, non-Russell 2000 index stocks carry a median price-to-book value ratio of 1.34. But index stocks are accorded a 61.9 percent valuation premium at 2.16 price-to-book as of June 30. The premium has been in place each of the last 10 years but has been rising. In 2006, for example, it was just 12 percent.“There’s no doubt in my mind that passive investing in E.T.F.s and index funds inflates the price of index stocks versus non-index stocks,” said Brian Frank, who manages the Frank Value mutual fund. “The whole market is overvalued,” he added. “Index stocks are more overvalued.”Randall Morck, a business professor at the University of Alberta, has also concluded that stocks with the good fortune to be included in a major index receive premium valuation over those that are left out. Professor Morck is gathering data on current index valuations. He has tracked stock valuations through 2009. “It appears that the index premium rises as the market becomes more overvalued,” he said.Professor Wurgler has also researched index premiums. “The evidence says that stock prices increasingly depend not just on fundamentals but also on the happenstance of index membership,” he said.Passive investment vehicles, promoted for diversification benefits, also fall short of such claims. During the August downturn, the correlation in index stock movement spiked and was “very high” according to David Pope, managing director of quantitative research at S&P; Capital IQ. Mr. Xiong of Morningstar says that index stocks — even apart from the correction — tend to move together. “We clearly see trading commonality,” Mr. Xiong said. With higher correlation, “diversification benefits decline,” he added.The rise of passive investing in the current bull market has most distorted the valuation of small- and midcap stocks, some experts maintain. Frank Gannon, co-chief investment officer at Royce & Associates, says that every market cycle is dominated by specific and historically differentiated factors.The two most significant factors in the current market cycle, he says, have been the Fed’s quantitative easing and the growth of passive investing. These have worked together to benefit weaker companies that are often laden with debt and bereft of earnings. Currently, roughly one-third of all the companies in the Russell 2000, are not earning any money, the highest percentage of non-earners in the history of the index, according to Mr. Gannon. So on one hand, quantitative easing has helped the weakest companies refinance debt at lower rates. On the other, passive investing has lifted the share prices of the weak along with the strong. “The growth of passive investing in the small-cap space has supported the non-earners in indexes like the Russell 2000,” Mr. Gannon said.Asked to illustrate overvaluation with specific pairs of index and non-index stocks, Mr. Frank, the portfolio manger, cited Sovran Self Storage and Public Storage. Both are in the self-storage business, which has been flourishing. Public Storage, which is in the S.&P.; 500, trades at a multiple of 36.9 times trailing 12-month earnings. Sovran, not in the index, trades at 31.7 times trailing earnings.Premium index valuation is also illustrated by comparison of the freight haulers J.B. Hunt Transport Services and Swift Transportation, according to Mr. Frank. J.B. Hunt, which is in the S.&P.; 500, trades at 20.6 times trailing 12-month earnings. Swift carries a multiple of just under 11. Price-to-book value for J.B. Hunt is at a ratio of 6.2 to 1. For Swift, it is just under 3.8 to 1.David Blitzer, chairman of the index committee at S&P; Dow Jones, said that index inclusion “raises the profile” of a company, which tends to increase valuations in several ways. Stock mutual funds and E.T.F.s held by long-term investors own about 12 percent of the shares of each stock in the S.&P.; 500, he said. Inclusion therefore reduces the supply of available shares, putting upward pressure on price, he added. Another factor, he said, is that “an index is a good place to look for takeover candidates” for mergers and acquisitions, noting that “about 10 to 15 stocks within the S.&P.; 500 are taken over each year.”Investors who want to avoid exclusive exposure to the premium value stocks of the S.&P.; 500 and Russell 2000 do have other choices. Vanguard, for example, offers the Total Stock Market E.T.F. which tracks a broader stock market universe — a total of 4,000 large-cap, midcap and microcap stocks in the CRSP US Total Market index. The Vanguard Total Stock Market mutual fund also tracks that index, which represents nearly all United States stocks and diversifies market exposure. Vanguard spokesmen did not respond to requests for comment.Nobody can say for sure whether the premium valuation of stocks in the S.&P.; 500 and Russell 2000 indexes will end with a bang or a whimper. Professor Wurgel notes that in the October 1987 market crash, stocks that were members of the big indexes dropped 7 percent more than non-index stocks. “I won’t be surprised if we see more of this sort of thing,” he added.Of course, investors concerned about premium valuation and high correlation among S.&P.; 500 and Russell 2000 stocks can opt for broader index-based funds, while investors of a more active bent may want to seek out non-index stocks that suffer in valuation comparisons with index peers.So where is this all headed? We don’t really know.Two academic researchers who collaborated on a study that found evidence of premium valuation for index stocks foresee differing consequences.“I think index stocks would be hurt more in a deeper downturn,” said David Nanigian, associate professor of investments at the American College in Bryn Mawr, Pa.But Michael Finke, a co-author of the study and a professor of personal financial planning at Texas Tech University, sees things playing out less dramatically.More likely than a sharp sell-off in index stocks is the continuing popularity and even greater overvaluation of the group, he said. In time, Professor Finke suggests, index stocks will become ever more overvalued and that fact will finally be broadly recognized. The eventual result? “They will underperform,” he predicted, suggesting a shift by investors to non-index stocks.Wise investors may still opt to choose index-based funds, but they should at least be aware of premium and diversification issues. And they should be careful about which indexes their funds are tracking.United States markets were mixed on Wednesday as investors assessed the latest earnings reports. Walmart shares fell sharply after the company said that sales would be “relatively flat” this year because of currency fluctuations. JPMorgan Chase led financial stocks lower as its earnings fell short of analysts’ expectations.KEEPING SCORE In early afternoon trading, the Dow Jones industrial average fell 0.62 percent and the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index declined 0.16 percent. The Nasdaq composite index rose 0.15 percent.MIXED BANK BAG Investors were assessing the earnings of three big banks on Wednesday. While Bank of America stock gained after reporting earnings, shares of JPMorgan and Wells Fargo declined.JPMorgan said late Tuesday that its profit rose 22 percent, but its earnings still fell short of analysts’ estimates. JPMorgan’s stock sank 2.8 percent. Wells Fargo reported a slight gain in profit for the quarter, but its lending margins fell. Shares of Wells Fargo declined 1.3 percent. Bank of America stock rose 1.2 percent.WALMART WORRIES Shares of Walmart Stores slumped 8.6 percent after the retailer announced that its sales would be flat this year because big fluctuations in currency markets had crimped the value of its overseas sales. Walmart also said its earnings per share would shrink as much as 12 percent in 2017 because of an investment program.THE QUOTE Despite rebounding in October, the S.&P.; 500 and the Dow are still lower for the year after a big slump in the previous two months on worries about global economic growth. Some investors say the declines are overdone, and they expect a rebound in the final quarter.“The U.S. is in pretty good shape,” said Michael Scanlon, managing director and portfolio manager at John Hancock Asset Management. “You can overreact and take a view on every economic data point that we get, but that’s probably not in your best interest.”EUROPEAN MARKETS In Germany, the DAX fell 0.3 percent, and in France, the CAC 40 rose 0.1 percent. The FTSE 100 was down 0.4 percent in Britain.CHINA DATA Data showed that Chinese inflation eased in September, stoking expectations that Beijing would have more leeway for interest rate reductions or other forms of stimulus to prop up slowing economic growth. Consumer prices rose 1.6 percent from a year earlier, compared with 2 percent in August. The weak trade data released on Tuesday weighed on sentiment for a second day. The fall in China’s imports for September spurred concern about demand, damping the prices of commodities. It also drove down the currencies of commodity-reliant countries such as Australia.ASIA’S DAY The Nikkei 225 slumped 1.9 percent in Japan, while in Hong Kong, the Hang Seng slid 0.7 percent. The Shanghai Composite Index dropped 0.9 percent in China. The Kospi was down 0.5 percent in South Korea. In Australia, the S.&P.;/ASX 200 lost 0.1 percent.ENERGY Benchmark United States crude oil fell 44 cents to $46.22 a barrel on New York Mercantile Exchange. Brent crude, used to price international oils, fell 42 cents to $49.30 a barrel in London.CURRENCIES AND BONDS The euro rose 0.2 percent to $1.1411 while the dollar slipped 0.1 percent to 119.63 yen. Bond prices rose. The yield on the 10-year Treasury note fell to 2 percent.WASHINGTON —  Daniel K. Tarullo, a member of the Federal Reserve’s Board of Governors, said on Tuesday he did not “expect that it would be appropriate” for the Fed to start raising its benchmark rate this year, breaking with the stated position of the Fed’s chairwoman, Janet L. Yellen.Mr. Tarullo spoke, in an interview with CNBC, less than 24 hours after another Fed governor, Lael Brainard, expressed similar hesitation in a speech  Monday afternoon.The comments by two officials on the Federal Open Market Committee who rarely speak publicly about monetary policy suggested that Ms. Yellen is facing growing internal opposition to the view she expressed last month that it will probably make sense to start raising rates this year to maintain control of inflation.“Yellen appears to have a revolt on her hands,” said Tim Duy, a professor of economics at the University of Oregon who follows the central bank closely. “She now faces the prospect of multiple dissents from the dovish wing of the F.O.M.C. if she insists on pushing through with a rate hike this year. Such a split decision would not enhance the institution’s credibility.”Ms. Brainard, a former Obama administration official who joined the Fed in 2014, and Mr. Tarullo, an adviser to Mr. Obama’s first presidential campaign before joining the Fed in 2009, both have roots in the world of Democratic economic policy making.Leading members of that community, including the Harvard economist Lawrence H. Summers, have sharply criticized the Fed’s movement toward raising interest rates. Those critics have coalesced around a fairly uniform set of concerns that appear to resonate with Ms. Brainard and Mr. Tarullo.The differences, however, remain relatively narrow and could be resolved by new rounds of economic data in the coming months. Slower growth could persuade Ms. Yellen — who also has strong Democratic credentials and was a chief economic adviser to President Bill Clinton — to wait a little longer. Better news or rising inflation could persuade the skeptics to move more quickly.Michael Feroli, the chief United States economist at JPMorgan Chase, said that despite the fragmentation of the policy making committee, he expected Ms. Yellen and her right-hand man, Stanley Fischer, vice chairman of the Fed, to maintain control.“We still believe the Yellen-Fischer leadership can pull the committee together for a December liftoff, but in the interim the communications may continue to sound inharmonious,” he wrote Tuesday.The Fed has held short-term rates near zero since 2008 to stimulate economic activity by encouraging borrowing and risk-taking. Now, in the sixth year of a slow-but-steady expansion, officials are debating the right moment to start raising rates.The Fed could stall the economy if it scares borrowers by raising rates too quickly. Waiting too long could also end badly if inflation starts to rise or speculative asset bubbles pop.In a major speech last month, Ms. Yellen said continued job growth was likely to lead to higher inflation, and the Fed planned to start raising rates this year. She spoke before the government estimated the economy added just 142,000 jobs in September. But in a speech on Sunday, Mr. Fischer said he still expected the Fed to move this year.The most likely date is the final 2015 meeting of the Fed’s policy making committee on Dec. 15 and 16. Fed officials have said they are not likely to act at the committee’s Oct. 27 and 28 meeting.Other officials have lined up in favor of an increase sooner rather than later. Jeffrey M. Lacker, president of the Richmond, Va., Fed, voted to raise rates at the September meeting. James B. Bullard, president of the St. Louis Fed, said Tuesday that it would be “prudent” to start this year.The Fed said Tuesday, in a scheduled release, that eight of the 12 regional reserve banks had supported a September increase in a secondary but symbolic rate called the discount rate.Two Fed officials were already on the record as opposing a rate increase this year: Charles L. Evans, the Chicago president, and Narayana Kocherlakota, the Minneapolis president. But regional Fed presidents often take public stands. The Washington-based governors like Mr. Tarullo and Ms. Brainard seldom do.The unemployment rate is approaching a normal level by historical standards, but by other measures the labor market remains weak. Moreover, the historical pattern that inflation rises as unemployment falls — a relationship that economists call the Phillips Curve — has weakened in recent years. Inflation is also being suppressed by other forces, including a strong dollar, low energy prices and what Mr. Tarullo described as a “globally disinflationary environment.”“I don’t think anybody knows how much more progress could be made in a noninflationary fashion,” he said Tuesday. “My own perspective is that one should watch to see some tangible evidence that inflation would return to target.”He said the Fed could not easily correct its mistake if it moved too soon and growth stalled.Ms. Brainard would not say when she expected to start raising rates, but she expressed even stronger reservations than Mr. Tarullo that strong job growth was a sufficient reason to do so as long as inflation is quiescent.“I do not view the improvement in the labor market as a sufficient statistic for judging the outlook for inflation,” she said. “A variety of econometric estimates would suggest that the classic Phillips Curve influence of resource utilization on inflation is, at best, very weak at the moment.”Ms. Yellen said in September that if the Fed waited to raise rates and then was forced to increase rates more sharply to control inflation, it “would risk disrupting financial markets and perhaps even inadvertently push the economy into recession.”Ms. Brainard said she was not overly concerned the Fed might wait too long.“We have well-tested tools to address such a situation,” she said, “and plenty of policy room in which to use them.”Cutting the financial cord with adult children can be hard to do.Just ask Virginia Illiano, a substitute teacher who lives in Brooklyn. After her daughter graduated from an expensive private college, Ms. Illiano thought her days of paying big bills for her daughter were over.She was wrong. Her daughter, who is in her 20s, was not able to find a good-paying job and ended up moving in with her mother. That was just the beginning. Ms. Illiano co-signed for a leased car, repaid some of her daughter’s credit card debt and even paid for her nails, vacations and some clothes.“My teacher benefits are awesome, but she won’t have any of that,” said Ms. Illiano, 55, who is divorced. And that’s just fine with Ms. Illiano.“I told my daughter to go for her dream,” she said, explaining that she wanted her “to have her financial legs.”Ms. Illiano’s financial leg up for her daughter, however, has a downside. She is dipping into her own retirement funds, which means she is now looking at a couple of difficult choices: working longer or selling her home, which is already being used as collateral for her daughter’s student loan.More older parents are facing challenges like Ms. Illiano’s. They are helping their adult children by dishing out loans or cash gifts, or paying bills. But this largess sometimes blows a big hole in their finances, even jeopardizing their retirement. As a result, some older adults are going back to work, reducing their own living expenses or even declaring bankruptcy.While rigorous data is difficult to obtain, several reports suggest that the problems associated with supporting adult children are growing. At the same time, many baby boomers are far short of holding enough in their retirement accounts to support themselves into old age.“Some adult children aren’t making enough money,” said Netiva Heard, a certified debt counselor at MNH Credit Solutions in Chicago. “So parents are taking over certain bills like credit cards, cellphones and rent.”Parents, of course, want the best for their children from the moment they are born and are used to doing everything they can to help them. Continuing that support into adulthood has spread, experts say, largely because the economy of the last decade has fallen short in generating good job opportunities for their millennial children.“But the last thing you want is for your kids to end up taking care of you financially,” Ms. Heard said. “And, anyway, kids can learn from their own money struggles.”Baby boomers face increasing retirement challenges of their own as traditional defined benefit pensions have been widely replaced by riskier 401(k) plans and the like, which require disciplined savings. Many have not done the comprehensive financial planning needed to factor in the greater chance that they will live longer, or accumulated enough in savings and investments to cover future health expenses.“So they’re not looking at the long-term effects of shelling out $5,000 or so per year to adult kids,” said Jamie Hopkins, associate professor of taxation at the American College of Financial Services in Bryn Mawr, Pa. “That money could be funding an I.R.A. contribution.”There are clear warning signs, experts said, that parents may be giving their adult children too much money. These include taking loans from 401(k) accounts, failing to make full retirement account contributions or draining savings.Take Jacquelyn McClellan, 74, who lives in Orange City, Fla. In what admittedly is an extreme case, Ms. McClellan, a retired program analyst for the federal government, began paying for various expenses for her grandchildren after her son said he could not afford them. She paid for dancing school, parochial school, trips to Disneyland, all with the help of money from her pension.These payments ended up tipping Ms. McClellan into bankruptcy in 2011. Since then, Ms. McClellan has sharply dialed back her own lifestyle. She can’t go on vacation cruises and has only minimal savings.Still, Ms. McClellan felt a sense of duty to help out her grandchildren. “I didn’t want them to have a bad life,” she said, adding that they are now flourishing.Giving some financial help can be a much-needed balm for family members. The problem is, many parents approaching or already in retirement do not know where they stand financially and how much they can afford to give without undermining their own security.Giving gifts of money to chronically needy adult children can become expensive very quickly.To solve a money squeeze, avoid giving away inheritances early, said Eric J. Schaefer, a certified financial planner at Evermay Wealth Management in Arlington, Va. Adult children often only end up coming back for more money, he explained.Supporting more extravagant expenses like a fancy car or country club memberships should be cut off altogether, Mr. Schaefer recommended.One-time loans, or gifts, that are used to pay for unexpected emergencies like medical expenses require little thought for parents who can afford them.But going back to the money trough time and time again is dangerous. “Look at kids and ask, ‘What is the money for?’” said Robert J. Semrad in Chicago, the senior partner at DebtStoppers, a bankruptcy law firm. “Is this a solution to the problem or just a Band-Aid? Many times money given as a Band-Aid merely delays the inevitable.”Avoid co-signing loans for cars or homes, Mr. Semrad said, since a parent’s own credit can be jeopardized. “Banks can go after co-signers,” he said. “And having assets makes you more susceptible.”Properly drafted loans by parents to their children can teach the children valuable financial lessons, though. The keys, experts said, are to give the loans set terms and to establish a regular repayment schedule.Peter Lazaroff, a financial adviser at Plancorp in Missouri, recommends loans that include interest rates. The loan then works just like a bond, he added, and the parent gets back principal and interest. The child should also sign a contract, which can be drafted by a lawyer. A loan that is not paid back can be deducted from an inheritance.Kathleen Gurney, who runs the Financial Psychology Corporation in Florida, encouraged parents to structure a loan as if a son or daughter were a business partner. The contract should include loan terms, length and consequences for nonpayment.“Loaning money works well,” she said, “if the process is objective and well planned.”Ms. Gurney has seen many cases in which older parents helped their adult children, only to end up in dire financial straits themselves. One couple she counseled had to return to work part time in a restaurant because they had decided to support their divorced son’s wife and children.“These financial decisions can affect your health and marriage,” she said. “And some people even slip into depression because they must continue to work.”Experts also caution against giving a loan to an adult child who clearly cannot repay it. Family loans, they point out, are common, but being paid back is less so.Instead of cash, parents can offer their children networking help in looking for a job and provide other forms of support. But when gifts or loans are involved, the most important thing is to be honest with yourself — and your children.“Tough love,” said Mr. Hopkins at the American College, “requires parents to plan what they give their children. So you must have a process in place.”The Jarden Corporation said on Wednesday that it had reached an agreement to acquire Jostens Inc., which makes high-school memorabilia such as yearbooks and class rings, for about $1.5 billion, including debt.Jarden, a consumer products company with more than 120 brands, obtained Jostens through the purchase of the Visant Holding Corporation, the parent of Jostens and related businesses, from a group of private-equity firms including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Company and aPriori Capital Partners, according to a statement released on Wednesday.Jarden’s shares were up about 2 percent in early afternoon trading after news of the transaction was disclosed. When it came to Jarden’s criteria for acquisition targets — such as market leaders, defensible businesses and cash generators — Jostens was the “sweet spot,” said Martin E. Franklin, the founder of Jarden.“We’re taking a mature business that hasn’t been a grower for some time and we think we can grow it,” Mr. Franklin said in a telephone interview on Wednesday. He said he planned to use Jarden’s procurement and technology capabilities to help strengthen revenue growth at Jostens.Jostens traces its history to 1897 in Owatonna, Minn., where Otto Josten, a jewelry repairman, created the class ring. The company was publicly traded from 1965 until 2000. Since then, it has cycled through several owners, and was ultimately acquired, along with two smaller companies in the textbook and printing industries, by the two buyout firms in 2004.The deal will enhance Jarden’s gross profit and operating margins in 2016, James Lillie, the chief executive, said in the statement. Jostens has $740 million in annual revenue, which would have helped bring Jarden’s total to about $10 billion in the 12 months through June, the company said. Jarden expects the transaction to increase the company’s adjusted earnings per share in 2016.The acquisition of Jostens comes after Jarden agreed in July to acquire the disposable dinnerware maker the Waddington Group for about $1.35 billion. This is the first year that Jarden has done two “sizable transactions,” Mr. Franklin said.Barclays and Morgan Stanley were financial advisers to Jarden, while Kane Kessler served as legal counsel. Jefferies was Visant’s financial adviser and Simpson Thacher & Bartlett was its legal counsel.Kenneth Koe, an inventor of Zoloft, the antidepressant that has helped tens of millions of people since it was introduced a quarter-century ago, died on Oct. 7 in Shrewsbury, Mass. He was 90.His death was announced by his alma mater, Reed College, in Portland, Ore.A chemist who spent four decades on the staff of Pfizer, Dr. Koe developed Zoloft, known generically as sertraline hydrochloride, with his colleague Willard Welch. One of the class of selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors — compounds that emerged in the late 20th century to treat depression, anxiety and related disorders — Zoloft became, with its fellow class member Prozac, among the most widely prescribed drugs in the world.More than 100 million people have been treated with Zoloft since 1991, when it was brought to market in the United States. In 2005, the year before it became available as a generic, worldwide sales of Zoloft totaled more than $3 billion. (Prozac, first marketed in the late 1980s, became available generically in 2001.)In 2005, Science magazine included Zoloft on its list of 19 “blockbuster” drugs. That list, comprising drugs that had generated revenue of $2 billion or more in the preceding year, also included Lipitor, which lowers cholesterol; the nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory Celebrex, prescribed for arthritis; and the antacid Nexium.Zoloft, whose side effects can include nausea, reduced sexual desire and, in young people, increased suicidal thoughts or behavior, is also prescribed for conditions including panic disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder, post-traumatic stress disorder and premenstrual dysphoric disorder.The son of Benjamin and Monta Jean Koe, immigrants from China, Dr. Koe was born in Astoria, Ore., on April 15, 1925. His father worked in local salmon canneries before the family settled in Portland, where they ran a laundry.Ken Koe received a bachelor’s degree in chemistry from Reed, which he attended on a full scholarship, followed by a master’s in the field from the University of Washington and a Ph.D. from the California Institute of Technology.In 1955, Dr. Koe joined Pfizer’s laboratory in Brooklyn. He worked for several years on antibiotics before being assigned to a group charged with developing psychotherapeutic drugs for conditions including depression, anxiety and schizophrenia. He focused in particular on drugs that would enhance the efficacy of the neurotransmitter serotonin, whose role in the biochemistry of depression was just starting to be understood.Starting in the late 1970s, he and Dr. Welch began concentrated work on what would become Zoloft. By modifying an earlier, ineffectual drug that had been abandoned in development, they were able to build a molecule that inhibited serotonin’s reabsorption in the brain. As a result, more serotonin remained available for neurotransmission, which in many people turned out to ease depression.A longtime resident of Ledyard, Conn., Dr. Koe retired in 1995 from Pfizer’s central research facility in Groton. For their work on Zoloft, he and colleagues were honored by the American Chemical Society in 2006.Dr. Koe’s wife, the former Jo Ann Lew, died in 1995. His survivors include two daughters, Kristin M. Koe and Karen E. Koe; a sister, Virginia Wong; and five grandchildren.In 2008, on receiving the Howard Vollum Award for distinguished accomplishment in science and technology from Reed, Dr. Koe said that whenever he was identified in public as an inventor of Zoloft, strangers approached him to thank him.It has been a bad stretch for hedge funds that make bold bets on big economic trends. Two prominent multibillion-dollar macro hedge funds have shut down in the last week after double-digit losses.The Bain Capital Absolute Return Capital fund blamed a “challenging environment” for its shutdown. And Michael Novogratz, the well-known Wall Street trader who ran Fortress Investment Group’s flagship macro fund, which is also closing, went further, stating that the environment was “not conducive to achieving our best results.”But it is not all bad news for macro hedge funds, the corner of the hedge fund universe where managers wager on everything from currency moves to central bank interest rate increases and the direction of the price of oil. Some lesser-known macro-focused hedge funds like Element Capital Management and Atreaus Capital have made double-digit gains for investors so far this year.“Whenever you have a challenge, that is in itself an opportunity,” said Ari Bergmann, founder of Penso Advisors, a global macro manager. “I think that macro strategies thrive when there is divergence in monetary policy in central banks and market volatility,” Mr. Bergmann added, referring to the market expectation that the Federal Reserve will raise interest rates while most other major central banks continue to hold rates steady.Bain Capital and Fortress were not the first firms to liquidate their hedge funds this year. Across the hedge fund industry, firms are shutting down after months of market turmoil that has pulled some of Wall Street’s most well-versed traders into the riptide. Prominent investors like David Einhorn, William A. Ackman, Leon G. Cooperman and Daniel S. Loeb have had a reversal in gains made this year.On Tuesday, the $27 billion Renaissance Technologies became the latest to tell investors that it would close a fund — its $1 billion Renaissance Institutional Futures Fund — citing a “lack of investor interest,” according to an investor letter seen by The New York Times. The fund has lost 1.75 percent so far this year.Many macro hedge fund managers were unable to stem losses because of violent moves in the market this year. Several were clobbered at the start of the year after an unexpected move by the Swiss central bank to lift its cap on the Swiss franc against the euro. Others were hurt by the Chinese central bank’s sudden decision to devalue its currency, the renminbi, in August.“It’s no secret that it’s been really difficult to trade this year,” Adam Taback, deputy chief investment officer at Wells Fargo Private Bank, said. “Macro hedge funds in particular have seen this because of the commodity rout that not only impacted commodities but currencies too,” Mr. Taback said.While this year has been full of market surprises, the losses at Bain Capital and Fortress have been years in the making. When the Bain Capital Absolute Return Capital fund, run by Jonathan J. Goodman and Jeff Woolbert, told investors last week that it would close down its macro fund, it had already been losing money for three years. This year, the fund was down by more than 14 percent. Bain Capital told investors that it had received requests from investors to withdraw a sizable amount of their money from the fund.Bain did not respond to a request for comment.Fortress’s flagship macro fund lost more than 17 percent this year, pulled down by wrong-footed positions, such as a bet against the Swiss franc. Last year, it was down 1.6 percent for the year.On Tuesday, Fortress notified investors that it would liquidate its macro hedge fund and that Mr. Novogratz, the chief investment officer, would leave the firm. Mr. Novogratz, well known on Wall Street for his outspoken views on the markets and his penchant for wearing colorful clothing, told investors that it had been “an extremely challenging two years.”In a joint statement, Fortress’s top executives, Peter L. Briger Jr., Wesley R. Edens and Randal A. Nardone, expressed disappointment. “While we regret closing a fund that has been productive in the past, we also recognize the market’s reluctance to ascribe value to this strategy even in its best years,” they wrote.Yet even so, several financial advisers have also recommended that investors allocate more money to macro hedge funds in recent months. SkyBridge Capital, a fund that invests in hedge funds, began the year with no money in any macro managers. Today it has more than 6 percent of its total $13.4 billion in assets under management in macro strategies.And macro hedge funds have outpaced other hedge fund strategies, according HFR, a firm that tracks industry data. Macro hedge funds have lost 0.6 percent so far this year, compared with 2.2 percent for the broader industry index and 2.7 percent for the Standard & Poor’s 500-stock index.“There are going to be winners and losers, and if you missed those big moves and if you got a couple of things wrong it becomes very hard for investors to become patient,” said Troy Gayeski, a senior portfolio manager at SkyBridge Capital.“In general, everyone goes through tough patches,” Mr. Gayeski added. “One of the keys is to be able to articulate to your investors that you know how you will get out of the tough patch in the future.”The criminal trial of three former leaders of the law firm Dewey & LeBoeuf is slowly becoming a story about the ordeal of the jurors, who have been deliberating the defendants’ fate for 17 days after sitting through a trial that began in late May.On Tuesday in Manhattan, the jury of seven women and five men reached a partial verdict — for the second time in a week — that acquitted the men of some of the dozens of charges against them. But the jury told the trial judge it remained deadlocked on 93 other counts, including the most serious charges.Last Wednesday, the jury acquitted the defendants, Steven H. Davis, Stephen DiCarmine and Joel Sanders, of more than three dozen charges of falsifying business records at the once-prominent law firm. The acquittals on Tuesday were on similar charges. The jury has yet to reach agreement on charges such as grand larceny, conspiracy, scheme to defraud and securities fraud.The men are charged with overseeing a scheme to manipulate Dewey’s financial records to persuade banks and investors to continue providing financing to the firm, which filed for bankruptcy in May 2012.The second partial verdict in a week makes the possibility of a mistrial more likely, especially since the deliberations were cut short because one juror was sick and said he had dozed off in the jury room.But Justice Robert M. Stolz of New York State Supreme Court in Manhattan told the jurors he wanted them to continue trying to reach a verdict on the remaining counts.Still, the judge acknowledged several times on Tuesday that the proceedings had become something of a grind for the jurors, a few of whom looked away when they were told to continue their deliberations.“I understand how long you have been at this,” Justice Stolz told the jurors just before a lunch break. And in dismissing the jurors for the day, he said, “I recognize this has not been a very efficient day.”If the juror who was ill cannot continue, the judge could replace him with an alternate — an option raised on Tuesday that would require the jury to begin its deliberations anew on the dozens of unresolved charges.The former Dewey & LeBoeuf executives are accused of masterminding a four-year scheme to manipulate the finances of the law firm to keep it afloat during the financial crisis. The case is one of the most significant white-collar prosecutions brought by Cyrus R. Vance Jr., the Manhattan district attorney, and the proceedings have been closely watched by the New York legal community.Mr. Davis, the law firm’s former chairman, was an architect of the 2007 merger of two law firms that created Dewey & LeBoeuf. He then led the firm until April 2012, a few weeks before it filed for bankruptcy. Mr. DiCarmine, the firm’s former executive director, and Mr. Sanders, its former chief financial officer, were other major figures in Dewey’s management team.The heart of the prosecution’s case focused on year-end revenue adjustments that authorities said were intended to make the law firm’s finances appear healthier. Authorities said the adjustments were made to meet covenants in the firm’s bank loans and persuade insurance firms to invest in a $150 million bond offering in 2010.The last week was awash in retail bankruptcy filings — two of particular note.The one that got the most media attention was American Apparel. The good news is that the bankruptcy filing might end the company’s seemingly interminable fights with Dov Charney, its founder and former chief executive.  The company is sensibly indicating that it will continue to make its products in the United States, one thing that distinguishes it from a swarm of other discount clothing retailers.The process in that case is being driven by secured lenders, largely hedge funds, which will control the company when the dust settles. The host of unsecured trade creditors listed on the petition – including the law firm I worked for long ago  – probably are asking what will be left for them.The other big retail case of the week is City Sports, well known to anyone who attended school in Boston in the 1990s. Perhaps therein is the root of the problem. Somewhat confusingly, it filed for bankruptcy announcing its intention to reorganize, while saying that it must sell all of its stores by the end of the month. The filing also shows a host of unpaid trade creditors who must be wondering about their fate.A quick look at the docket shows that the company is party to a secured lending facility that gives the lenders a lien on all of the debtor’s assets, including its cash. That cash, we are told, is the “sole source of funding for operations and the costs of administering these Chapter 11 cases.” It is these lenders who are driving the show, demanding a court-approved sale this month.So the company is free to reorganize, but make it snappy.The cases speak to the debate underway about proposed changes to bankruptcy laws that would make the process cheaper for and potentially more favorable to businesses trying to reorganize.The Loan Syndications and Trading Association recently released a report focused on the importance of preserving Chapter 11 in its current form.It is in response to a  report released by the American Bankruptcy Institute that included what the association calls “harmful changes to the rights of secured creditors.” The institute instead portrays its proposed changes as restoring the balance of power in Chapter 11.There seems to be little doubt that secured creditors have taken control of Chapter 11. It was this reality that the governments of the United States and Canada exploited in the automotive bankruptcy cases during the financial crisis. Whether this is good or bad depends largely on where you stand.The syndications and trading association represents the interests of those who have taken control: the secondary market in pieces of secured loans facilitates that control. The bankruptcy institute represents bankruptcy interests more broadly, and went out of its way to propose changes to Chapter 11 that had broad support in the bankruptcy community. Some (including myself) have sometimes grumbled that the institute was, if anything, too cautious.In the absence of clear empirical evidence, which is still lacking on the crucial questions, that leads me to suspect the institute is more apt to get it right on this point.But the syndications and trading association has the clear benefit of inertia on its side. If Congress does nothing, as one might suspect will be the case, it wins.WeWork, a New York start-up valued at $10 billion with the mission “to create a world where people work to make a life, not just a living,” is seeking to put a contentious labor dispute behind it.On Tuesday, WeWork, which offers temporary office space with perks like arcade games, showers and coffee bars to entrepreneurs and big businesses alike, said it would now use unionized contractors to provide janitorial services for its locations in New York and Boston.The agreement comes after months of protests from former WeWork cleaners, who were paid as little as $10 an hour through a nonunion contractor, Commercial Building Maintenance.In the weeks ahead, WeWork will put out a request for proposals from unionized cleaning contractors in New York and Boston. As part of its request, it will ask that former C.B.M. workers be hired. For former Commercial Building cleaners that WeWork does not hire directly, the company has set aside $250,000 for severance payments, which will be allocated based on years of service.The settlement is an abrupt turn for WeWork, which was facing criticism from its members — the individuals and businesses who rent space — many of whom sympathized with the laid-off janitors.“This was a case of two organizations that really didn’t know each other,” said Arthur Minson, WeWork’s chief operating officer. “Once we were able to sit down with the union, in a matter of a few weeks’ time we moved from foes to friends.”The dispute began this year, when cleaners working for C.B.M. realized they made far less than unionized janitors in New York. With help from the local chapter of Service Employees International Union, they began to demonstrate outside WeWork spaces, calling for union representation and higher wages.C.B.M. asked WeWork to renegotiate its contract to allow the workers to join a union, but WeWork declined, leading to the layoffs of about 100 cleaners. Instead, WeWork said it would directly employ janitors, or so-called community service associates, but would not commit to hiring all the former Commercial Building cleaners.Last month, tensions came to a boil, as WeWork’s chief executive and one of its founders, Adam Neumann, confronted protesters outside company headquarters. But until Tuesday, WeWork had not changed its position.Labor experts praised the deal.“This is a model agreement,” said Jennifer Gordon, a professor at the Fordham University School of Law who specializes in immigration and employment. “Cleaners stood up for their rights, and WeWork listened. The outcome here demonstrates that a firm can and should take responsibility for the treatment of workers whose labor benefits its business, whether it hires them directly or through a contractor.”As part of the agreement, S.E.I.U. will no longer pursue a charge it filed with the National Labor Relations Board accusing WeWork of discriminating against pro-union job applicants.“This in many ways is an unprecedented agreement,” said Hector Figueroa, president of the local S.E.I.U. chapter. “We hope that this helps more good jobs get associated with the sharing economy. Services workers that are part of these operations need to have a place in the new economy.”Former Commercial Building workers, many of whom were vocal in their frustration with WeWork, cheered the news as well.“It is very exciting for me and my former co-workers to see that WeWork is committing to good cleaning jobs and that I will have a chance to return to work there,” said Ivan Castelan, one of the former Commercial Building cleaners. “It feels really good to see that when working people stand together, we can change our lives and the lives of other workers for the better.”Mr. Minson said the community service associates that WeWork had already hired would be kept on staff. “As a fast-growing company, we have a robust need for talented people,” he said.He added that while WeWork had not decided how it would handle cleaning arrangements in other cities, he believed that the resolution of this ordeal would win the company good will.“Hopefully, people have learned that we are great partners to work with,” Mr. Minson said. “We’re incredibly reasonable and practical. We believe in the ‘we way’ of doing business.”In another sign of tension between Tribune Publishing and its two California newspapers, executives at the papers have disputed the company’s decision last month to adjust its revenue projections downward for the final quarter of 2015, and cite the papers’ performance as the reason for the revision.No rigorous financial review had been conducted by employees of the two papers to support the revisions, and little of significance had changed in the papers’ financial performance, according to an email exchange the executives had with corporate headquarters and interviews with five current and former employees of Tribune Publishing with knowledge of the papers’ finances. The people spoke on the condition of anonymity.The confusion expressed by executives at the two papers, The San Diego Union-Tribune and The Los Angeles Times, followed a directive from Sandra J. Martin, Tribune Publishing’s chief financial officer, on Sept. 17. In the email exchange, seen by The New York Times, she wrote that the company had “reviewed the forecast reports and believe there is risk in the San Diego numbers. Please take ad revenue in San Diego down $3.5 million, and rerun numbers.” The Los Angeles Times was, separately, also asked to reassess.The next day, Tribune Publishing issued lower financial guidance, based on what it described as a rigorous review, saying it reflected “lower forecasted revenue estimates for the year, concentrated in Southern California.” The company’s shares dropped sharply, wiping tens of millions off its market capitalization, and have only slightly recovered.In an email to headquarters in the days that followed, Russ Newton, the president and chief operating officer of The San Diego Union-Tribune, expressed surprise at the instructions to revise the forecast. “The projection does not seem realistic in my experience,” he wrote. “No one on my team appears to be the source of that decision.” Los Angeles Times executives privately also expressed confusion at the new guidance, according to the people with knowledge of the financial discussions.The Los Angeles Times had been sparring with headquarters for years, most recently under a new publisher, Austin Beutner, who was pursuing a local strategy emphasizing close ties with the community, in opposition to Tribune Publishing’s preference for a centralized operation for all its news properties. Mr. Beutner was fired on Sept. 8 after a year on the job and replaced by Timothy E. Ryan.In a statement late Tuesday, a Tribune Publishing spokesman said that the guidance revision “was the result of a review encompassing relevant financial inputs and forecasts from across the company, and reports and conversations with each of the business unit finance directors including from the California News Group.”Current and former Tribune Company staff members said the timing of the revisions prompted discomfort among those who run the California newspapers. Mr. Griffin was facing severe criticism from some employees and Los Angeles civic leaders over his decision to fire Mr. Beutner, and the revised guidance, they said, seemed to support an argument Mr. Griffin had made privately — that the decision was based on the publisher’s poor financial performance. (Los Angeles Times and Tribune executives knowledgeable about the company’s finances disputed that characterization of Mr. Beutner’s tenure.)The staff members point out that the company had not previously issued guidance outside of earnings calls, or singled out a particular part of its business for credit or blame. Tribune Publishing has been a stand-alone company for 14 months, after being spun off from the larger Tribune Company.In its statement on Tuesday, Tribune Publishing said: “Speculation by unnamed sources about the guidance revision has no basis in fact.” The email exchange between Ms. Martin and Mr. Newton, it said, “reflects the fact that our leaders keep a close eye on whether the financial plan as a whole is tracking the reality of the business itself, even as they encourage operating teams to drive to the highest possible performance.”The company is in a quiet period, it said, and will update investors further in a third-quarter earnings announcement this year.In a conference call with investors on Sept. 22, Ms. Martin seemed to connect the new guidance with Mr. Beutner’s departure. The update and review, she said, came “following the departure of a key executive.”She added that the projections had been recast by the new leadership in California to more closely reflect the trends and the advertising environment. But the current and former staff members said that Mr. Ryan, the new publisher, had not had enough time to comprehensively assess the businesses.In a subsequent message to Ms. Martin, Mr. Newton provided figures which ran counter to the company’s argument that the San Diego paper needed to revise its forecast.“After receiving the email below,” Mr. Newton wrote to Tribune executives on Sept. 24, “I was somewhat confused by the request to reduce our San Diego forecast by $3.5m for the balance of the year.”The Union-Tribune prepared and sent a new, detailed analysis which calculated that in the worst case the paper would miss its projections by no more than $821,000.In the same series of messages, Christopher H. Argentieri, senior vice president of business operations for The Los Angeles Times, said that he agreed with Mr. Newton, according to the chain of emails. “Operationally we should continue to manage to the original forecast,” Mr. Argentieri wrote.In her reply to Mr. Newton and Mr. Argentieri, Ms. Martin said that the September forecast was made “with an eye toward de-risking Q4.Neither Mr. Newton nor Mr. Argentieri responded to messages seeking comment.SAN FRANCISCO — Twitter has appointed Omid Kordestani, who until recently was Google’s chief business officer, as its executive chairman.Jack Dorsey, the company’s chief executive and former chairman, announced the choice in a series of Twitter messages on Wednesday morning. “Omid is a proven & experienced leader, who will directly help & coach me and our leadership, and help us recruit the best folks to Twitter,” he wrote.Mr. Kordestani, who has a reputation for affability and business savvy, could bring a level of calm and stability to Twitter, which has been plagued by management chaos during its nine-year history.A company spokesman said Mr. Kordestani was unavailable for an interview but said he would play an active role in operations, supporting the leadership team and helping with recruiting.His appointment is the latest in a series of quick decisions by Mr. Dorsey, who announced Tuesday that Twitter planned to cut up to 8 percent of its work force.Mr. Kordestani was the 11th employee hired at Google. He joined the company in 1999, when it was a year old, and helped create its primary business of selling the ads that appear in Google searches.His original title was “business founder” and he oversaw Google’s first dollar of profit and built its first sales team. That model has since generated hundreds of billions of dollars and still accounts for more than half of Google’s annual revenue.“He was the guy that took Google from, like, no money to real money,” said Wesley Chan, a former Googler who is now a managing director at Felicis Ventures in Palo Alto, Calif.Mr. Kordestani left the company in 2009 but came back last year after his successor, Nikesh Arora, quit to join Softbank. As chief business officer, he was Google’s highest paid executive in 2014, with a $130 million pay package that consisted mostly of stock vesting over four years.In August, Mr. Kordestani left that role when Google reorganized into a technology conglomerate called Alphabet, but remained an adviser until this month.“We’re excited for Omid and very happy for Twitter,” a Google spokeswoman wrote in an email. “Omid was instrumental in establishing Google’s business and helped us develop really close, longstanding partnerships across the industry. We wish him every success in the years ahead.”Twitter has drawn much of its talent from Google, and recently, the flow of people has moved in the other direction, too. The two companies have grown closer in the last year, announcing partnerships to include Twitter messages in Google search results and to allow advertisers to use Google’s DoubleClick to buy ads on Twitter.When Mr. Dorsey was named chief executive of Twitter last week, he and the board promised to find an outside chairman. Mr. Dorsey, a co-founder of Twitter, also said he would seek additional outside candidates for the board, which has been criticized as insular and dominated by company insiders. Dick Costolo, the prior chief executive, left the board on Sept. 30.Mr. Kordestani does not appear to be a regular user of Twitter. Before his appointment, he had sent just eight tweets on his personal account.Some Twitter investors, most notably Chris Sacca, have complained that Twitter has too many board members who “don’t use the product.”NASHVILLE —  A powerful surge in construction is reshaping the physical character and economy of this 236-year-old river city, and fueling a deepening public conversation about essential civic values that many residents worry could be lost.More than 100 new projects, together valued at more than $2 billion, are underway in Nashville or planned to start next year, according to city figures. Most of the big projects — four hotels, five office buildings and eight high-rise residential towers with a total value of $1.5 billion — are in the downtown core, a number of them rising on former parking lots, according to the Nashville Downtown Partnership, a business development group.These include a 30-story, $220 million office building under construction on Fourth Avenue that will serve as the new headquarters of Bridgestone Americas, the United States division of Bridgestone, the world’s largest tire and rubber company. Under construction nearby is 222 Second Avenue S, a 25-story, $100 million, 350,000-square-foot building with 25,000 square feet of retail space.So many construction cranes are operating in downtown Nashville that they appear on the skyline as a flock of big birds, their extended beaks tugging at steel cables. A 454-room, 27-story, $120 million Westin is one of the high-rise hotels under construction. Just beyond downtown is OneCity, a $400 million mixed use project under construction that encompasses a million square feet of office space, 120,000 square feet of retail space, a 170-room hotel and up to 600 apartments.Even Music Row, the renowned neighborhood of recording studios and understated 20th-century music industry office buildings, has been affected. At the center of the temperate enclave, which once was set apart from the escalating construction clamor, is a 96,000-square-foot, five-story, $31 million office building nearing completion that will serve music production companies and talent representatives, including Sesac, a performing rights group that is moving from its old headquarters a block away.Never has this southern city of 660,000 residents experienced such a swarm of new projects, said Richard C. Bernhardt, who recently retired as director of the city’s planning department. The city, which spent all of the 20th century spreading out horizontally in low-rise apartment, retail, hotel and office buildings, is now going vertical. Nashville’s disparate, uneven skyline, highlighted by the twin spires of AT&T;’s 33-story, 617-foot-tall “Batman” building, which was finished in 1994, is about to add enough height, complexity and sharp angles to rival downtown Charlotte or Denver.The shift in urban design responds to Nashville’s consistent attractiveness as a place to live and work, especially to young professionals and musicians, and to the millennial generation’s allegiance to active, walkable urban neighborhoods, Mr. Bernhardt said. Nashville has grown by an average of 11,000 residents annually this decade, more than three times the average annual growth during the last decade.One critical move Nashville made in response to the growth, and to encourage more new construction, was adjusting the city’s zoning code to enable builders to combine residential, office, retail and entertainment spaces in their projects. “What we’re seeing now is the result of 20 years of preparation,” Mr. Bernhardt said. “This was a conscious effort to move the city forward, to make Nashville a more attractive place for investment.”Another significant step the city took was to invest in public parks. An 11-acre riverfront park opened this year to tie Nashville more closely to the Cumberland River. And Centennial Park, Nashville’s 112-year-old central park, is undergoing an extensive renovation to restore its broad lawns, walking paths and gardens.“Most people will tell you they like what’s happening,” said Sylvia Rapoport, a Nashville native and president of the Conservancy for the Parthenon and Centennial Park, which helped Metro Parks fund the $9 million restoration. “There’s an excitement about Nashville that we’ve never had. Young people are coming here to settle.”Nashville’s unleashed growth, though, has stirred civic concerns about how to solve the region’s swelling traffic problem, and about the city’s identity. City leaders and many residents agree that Nashville is in dire need of an improved transit system. Mayor Megan Barry, who took office in late September, campaigned on a platform that included promoting more bus and rail options.The transition to a city with livelier street life and much taller buildings has also unnerved some residents and spurred a discussion about Nashville’s distinctive way of life.“The flavor of Nashville is changing,” said Bob Bernstein, the founder and owner of Bongo Productions, who moved from Chicago in 1988 and owns a collection of popular Nashville restaurants and coffee shops. “Real estate prices, rents, they are going nuts. New, shiny stuff is happening all around. People who don’t own real estate, small operators, are being priced out of businesses they built.”“The city is on fire,” added Richard Lloyd, an associate professor of sociology at Vanderbilt University. “There’s excitement about the big city thing. But there’s anxiety, too. Some of it has to do with whether we are losing some part of our soul. Nashville always had this tension. It wants to be taken seriously, be big time. But it doesn’t want to lose the homeyness.”Still, in a departure from the polemical debates about growth in other American cities, which typically involve either unleashing developers or putting up high barriers of civic opposition, Nashville’s pursuit of a much denser urban experience is being undertaken with a kind of pragmatic wariness.That approach worked for Bridgestone Americas, which settled in Nashville in 1992 and now employs 1,100 people in a leased office tower near the airport. Facing the expiration of its lease in 2017, the company began a national search in 2012 for new space that could have led to Bridgestone’s leaving Nashville. By November 2014, when Bridgestone announced that it would lease an angular glass and steel tower developed by the Raleigh-based Highwoods Properties, Nashville’s downtown makeover was well underway.In 2013, Nashville opened Music City Center, its $623 million, 1.2 million-square-foot convention center on Fifth Avenue. Nearby, in April, the city opened a new 8,500-seat, $47 million baseball stadium for the Nashville Sounds, the AAA affiliate of the Oakland Athletics.“We looked closely at a lot of cities while we considered our move,” said Christine Karbowiak, the chief administrative officer and executive vice president of Bridgestone Americas, who is supervising the company’s relocation. “We chose Nashville. There’s a certain vibe downtown now that will be very appealing to current and future employees.”To some extent, Nashville can thank the commercial and cultural success of The Gulch, once a 60-acre stretch of vacant parcels and light industrial buildings along the CSX rail yard downtown that MarketStreet Enterprises, a local developer, turned into one of the city’s most active neighborhoods.The company started the project in 1999 with land purchases. In 2001, the city approved its master development plan. In 2008, MarketStreet Enterprises completed the 22-story Icon in the Gulch, a 418-unit residential building that included space for retail businesses and restaurants. Similar high-rise residential buildings followed, which provided the customer base for the new neighborhood’s trendy retail businesses and popular restaurants.The project’s newest phase is office construction. In May, MarketStreet Enterprises opened Gulch Crossing, an eight-story, 205,000-square-foot, $78.5 million office building with 16,000 square feet of street-level retail space. A few blocks away, Eakin Partners is building a 15-story, 285,000-square-foot, $95 million office tower with 26,000 square feet of retail space. MarketStreet Enterprises, which estimates that it has built 70 percent of the Gulch, also has a joint venture with AJ Capital Partners and the Berger Company to construct a 12-story, 224-room Thompson Nashville Hotel in the Gulch.To date, MarketStreet Enterprises has spent $750 million to construct 460,000 square feet of office space, 280,000 square feet of retail space and 1,480 residences, according to company figures. “We needed residential and retail to get people into the area,” said Jay Turner, managing director of MarketStreet Enterprises. “Now we’re into the office phase. We’re a local firm and we’re pretty patient. We wait for the right signals. We didn’t want to just create a big neighborhood from scratch in three years.”Almost 10 years ago, I knew a guy on a financial rocket ship. He had a great house, a successful business and a solid income.But then things changed. With the benefit of hindsight, it was clear he bought a little too much house and spent a little too much money. At the beginning, he was rewarded for buying the house. Its value went up a lot in a short time. For context, imagine Florida, Arizona or Las Vegas in 2006-7. Houses were selling even before hitting the official market and for way more than the asking price.Things continued to go well for this guy, and he decided to borrow money against the equity in his home to start a new business. But not long after, the rocket ship ran out of fuel.The value of his home dropped. In fact, the house eventually was worth less than what he paid for it. Then, his income dropped significantly because his business was tied closely to the local economy.Again, with the benefit of hindsight, this story looks like a series of obvious mistakes. And to his credit, this guy took full responsibility for every one of those decisions. Along the way, he dealt with mental and physical stress while trying to juggle the web of consequences arising from this experience.I imagine you can relate personally to this story or know someone who can. Given our history of booms and busts over the last 15 years, you’ve probably watched some version of this story play out more than once.Now fast-forward a couple of years. This guy had a bunch of stuff go well in his life. He now has superpositive net worth. His relationships are better than ever. He has taken steps to avoid repeating earlier mistakes.I share this story because I am that guy. I have asked myself over and over, “What did I do wrong to deserve the bad experience?” And then more recently, “What did I do right to deserve the good experience?”Notice how loaded the language is, with the emphasis on whether and when I was deserving.Over a series of conversations with a friend, I talked through my story and realized I could only identify the mistakes I made with the benefit of hindsight. As is often the case, it is very easy to look backward and make up stories about why certain things happened and then take either the blame or the credit for them. The reality of life is often a bit more nuanced. As I carefully reflect on the good and the bad experiences, I have come to the conclusion that, in both cases, I was simply doing the best I could with the knowledge and experience I had at the time.But when we look back at our stories, we need to be careful. Because, as I told my friend, “I can’t define exactly what I did to deserve the bad stuff or to deserve the good stuff.”Based on my past experiences, I reasoned with my friend, “If you fast-forward five years, I could end up homeless or own a private jet, or anything in between.” This friend, who happens to be a life coach, replied, “Yeah, and if you can get yourself to accept that, you’ll finally be free.”It took me awhile to understand what he meant. But I realized he was talking about the freedom we feel when we let go of the idea that we “deserve” any specific outcome.We’re certainly not free of personal responsibility. But consider the people who say they believe they can control their future. They tell themselves the story that if they just plan carefully enough, they can achieve certainty about what will happen.For years, many of us have believed this myth. In reality, life is irreducibly uncertain. That doesn’t make us more or less successful or more or less happy. The true joy in life, the real peace, comes when we let go of the idea that we deserve a predetermined happy ending.Of course, we’re going to have a goal on the horizon, and we’ll head toward it. But we may wake up tomorrow and say, “I’m not sure that’s the best direction to go anymore.” We then need to ask ourselves if things have changed, or if our goal just feels too hard. Do we need to push through a tough spot or chart a different path?Right now, I’m working really hard on both having goals and accepting the reality of uncertainty. In fact, I embrace the uncertainty and say to myself, “Given that goal, and given the uncertainty, what’s to be done next?”I repeat this process over and over. Every once in a while, I stick my head up and say, “I still want to head to that goal. Yes, I’m uncertain I’ll get there, but for now, I think that’s where I want to go.” Then, I put my head back down, figure out what’s to be done next and go do it.Whatever the goal, we can learn to trust ourselves and deal with the reality of uncertainty. And for me that’s become the definition of true freedom.When you really want something, you tend to pay up for it.Take Anheuser-Busch InBev, whose tentative $104 billion deal for SABMiller represents a premium of nearly 50 percent to where SABMiller shares were trading before reports of a possible deal merged in mid-September. That is about double the average premium this year, according to Dealogic.That Anheuser-Busch InBev would offer such a rich premium underscores how valuable it views a combination with SABMiller. The companies, the two biggest brewers in the world, have been grappling with slowing beer shipments and competition from upstart craft brewers, and they think profit margins could be improved if they could join forces.Of the 35 largest deals where the target is publicly traded, the premium in the deal for SABMiller ranks No. 9, according to data collated by Dealogic. While the biggest transactions tended to have large premiums – such as the 86 percent premium Warner-Lambert received when Pfizer acquired it – SABMiller’s premium bucked the trend seen more broadly this year.The average premium this year among deals of more than $1 billion is 26 percent, which is the lowest since 2007, the data showed.SABMiller previously rejected three of offers from Anheuser-Busch InBev that it deemed too low.The two companies have now asked British regulators for permission to extend a takeover deadline under British law until Oct. 28 to continue their merger talks.Last month, Cory Jones, a top editor at Playboy, went to see its founder Hugh Hefner at the Playboy Mansion.In a wood-paneled dining room, with Picasso and de Kooning prints on the walls, Mr. Jones nervously presented a radical suggestion: the magazine, a leader of the revolution that helped take sex in America from furtive to ubiquitous, should stop publishing images of naked women.Mr. Hefner, now 89, but still listed as editor in chief, agreed. As part of a redesign that will be unveiled next March, the print edition of Playboy will still feature women in provocative poses. But they will no longer be fully nude.Its executives admit that Playboy has been overtaken by the changes it pioneered. “That battle has been fought and won,” said Scott Flanders, the company’s chief executive. “You’re now one click away from every sex act imaginable for free. And so it’s just passé at this juncture.”For a generation of American men, reading Playboy was a cultural rite, an illicit thrill consumed by flashlight. Now every teenage boy has an Internet-connected phone instead. Pornographic magazines, even those as storied as Playboy, have lost their shock value, their commercial value and their cultural relevance.Playboy’s circulation has dropped from 5.6 million in 1975 to about 800,000 now, according to the Alliance for Audited Media. Many of the magazines that followed it have disappeared. Though detailed figures are not kept for adult magazines, many of those that remain exist in severely diminished form, available mostly in specialist stores. Penthouse, perhaps the most famous Playboy competitor, responded to the threat from digital pornography by turning even more explicit. It never recovered.Previous efforts to revamp Playboy, as recently as three years ago, have never quite stuck. And those who have accused it of exploiting women are unlikely to be assuaged by a modest cover-up. But, according to its own research, Playboy’s logo is one of the most recognizable in the world, along with those of Apple and Nike. This time, as the magazine seeks to compete with younger outlets like Vice, Mr. Flanders said, it sought to answer a key question: “if you take nudity out, what’s left?”It is difficult, in a media market that has been so fragmented by the web, to imagine the scope of Playboy’s influence at its peak. A judge once ruled that denying blind people a Braille version of it violated their First Amendment rights. It published stories by Margaret Atwood and Haruki Murakami among others, and its interviews have included Malcolm X, Vladimir Nabokov, Martin Luther King Jr. and Jimmy Carter, who admitted that he had lusted in his heart for women other than his wife. Madonna, Sharon Stone and Naomi Campbell posed for the magazine at the peak of their fame. Its best-selling issue, in November of 1972, sold more than seven million copies.Even those who disliked it cared enough to pay attention — Gloria Steinem, the pioneering feminist, went undercover as a waitress, or Playboy Bunny, in one of Mr. Hefner’s spinoff clubs to write an exposé for Show Magazine in 1963.When Mr. Hefner created the magazine, which featured Marilyn Monroe on its debut cover in 1953, he did so to please himself. “If you’re a man between the ages of 18 and 80, Playboy is meant for you,” he said in his first editor’s letter. “We enjoy mixing up cocktails and an hors d’oeuvre or two, putting a little mood music on the phonograph, and inviting in a female acquaintance for a quiet discussion on Picasso, Nietzsche, jazz, sex ...” He did not put a date on the cover of the first issue, in case Playboy did not make it to a second.Mr. Hefner “just revolutionized the whole direction of how we live, of our lifestyles and the kind of sex you might have in America,” said Dian Hanson, author of a six-volume history of men’s magazines and an editor for Taschen. “But taking the nudity out of Playboy is going to leave what?”The latest redesign, 62 years later, is more pragmatic. The magazine had already made some content safe for work, Mr. Flanders said, in order to be allowed on social media platforms like Facebook, Instagram and Twitter, vital sources of web traffic.In August of last year, its website dispensed with nudity. As a result, Playboy executives said, the average age of its reader dropped from 47 to just over 30, and its web traffic jumped to about 16 million from about four million unique users per month.The magazine will adopt a cleaner, more modern style, said Mr. Jones, who as chief content officer also oversees its website. There will still be a Playmate of the Month, but the pictures will be “PG-13” and less produced — more like the racier sections of Instagram. “A little more accessible, a little more intimate,” he said. It is not yet decided whether there will still be a centerfold.Its sex columnist, Mr. Jones said, will be a “sex-positive female,” writing enthusiastically about sex. And Playboy will continue its tradition of investigative journalism, in-depth interviews and fiction. The target audience, Mr. Flanders said, is young men who live in cities. “The difference between us and Vice,” he said, “is that we’re going after the guy with a job.”Some of the moves, like expanded coverage of liquor, are partly commercial, Mr. Flanders admitted; the magazine must please its core advertisers. And all the changes have been tested in focus groups with an eye toward attracting millennials — people between the ages of 18 and 30-something, highly coveted by publishers. The magazine will feature visual artists, with their work dotted through the pages, in part because research revealed that younger people are drawn to art.The company now makes most of its money from licensing its ubiquitous brand and logo across the world — 40 percent of that business is in China even though the magazine is not available there — for bath products, fragrances, clothing, liquor and jewelry among other merchandise. Nudity in the magazine risks complaints from shoppers, and diminished distribution.Playboy, which had gone public in 1971, was taken private again in 2011 by Mr. Hefner with Rizvi Traverse Management, an investment firm founded by Suhail Rizvi, a publicity-shy Silicon Valley investor, who has interests in Twitter, Square and Snapchat among others. The firm now owns over 60 percent. Mr. Hefner owns about 30 percent (some shares are held by Playboy management).The magazine is profitable if money from licensed editions around the world is taken into account, Mr. Flanders said, but the United States edition loses about $3 million a year. He sees it, he said, as a marketing expense. “It is our Fifth Avenue storefront,” he said.He and Mr. Jones feel that the magazine remains relevant, not least because the world has gradually adopted Mr. Hefner’s libertarian views on a variety of social issues. Asked whether Mr. Hefner’s views on women were the exception to that rule, Mr. Flanders responded that Mr. Hefner had “always celebrated the beauty of the female figure.”“Don’t get me wrong,” Mr. Jones said of the decision to dispense with nudity, “12-year-old me is very disappointed in current me. But it’s the right thing to do.”BERLIN — Volkswagen said on Tuesday that it would revamp the technology it uses for controlling diesel exhaust in future models as it struggles to overcome an emissions cheating scandal that has battered its reputation and threatened its financial stability.The company said it would switch to what it called a selective catalytic reduction system to decrease emissions on its diesel engines in Europe and North America, where the scandal erupted last month.The approach is conceptually similar to an emissions control system that Volkswagen considered until 2007, when it adopted the system now at the center of its scandal. The alternative technology, which is not part of its plan to fix cars already in circulation, was rejected by the company at the time as too costly.Reflecting the scandal’s mounting financial toll, Volkswagen also said on Tuesday that it would cut investments at its leading brand by 1 billion euros, or about $1.1 billion. That will limit the company’s ability to innovate at a time when carmakers are trying to keep ahead of a rush of new technology.Volkswagen, Europe’s leading automaker, was forced to admit that about 11 million of its diesel cars worldwide were equipped with software that allowed it to cheat on tests of noxious gas emissions. The company now faces a raft of investigations in the United States, Europe and China.The change involves adding a tank of a urea-based fluid to clean exhaust and affects only coming models, said Peter Thul, a spokesman for Volkswagen.“Diesel vehicles will only be equipped with exhaust emissions systems that use the best environmental technology,” Herbert Diess, chairman of the company’s car brand, based in Wolfsburg, Germany, said in a statement on Tuesday. The change will take place “as soon as possible,” according to the statement.It also appears that Volkswagen will be moving away from diesel as its preferred clean technology. Volkswagen said on Tuesday that it was pushing ahead with the development of electric and plug-in hybrid cars based on a series of components that can be used in different models.Exemplifying this shift will be a transformation of the next generation of the company’s luxury Phaeton limousine into an all-electric model, expected to reach showrooms in 2019 or 2020.Last week, Volkswagen submitted a detailed proposal to the authorities here of how it planned to remove from its vehicles in Germany the software used to cheat emissions tests. The Federal Motor Transport Authority is reviewing Volkswagen’s proposal to remedy the issue on its 1.2-, 1.6- and 2-liter diesel engines.The German Transport Ministry has said there will be a recall for affected vehicles, with a software fix for the 2-liter engines expected to be ready early next year. The 1.6-liter motors, however, would require further modifications that cannot be expected before later in 2016. No information has been released regarding a fix for the 1.2-liter engines.In testimony before the United States Congress last week and the British Parliament on Monday, Volkswagen officials indicated that fixes would vary by country, given varying emissions standards.Paul Willis, general manager of the Volkswagen Group in Britain, said on Monday that repairs for diesels sold in Europe would not involve the installation of a new emission filtration system using urea as an additive. But such a remedy is expected in many vehicles in the United States, which has tougher standards for emissions of nitrogen oxides, which have been linked to a host of respiratory and cardiovascular illnesses.Fallout from the scandal has ricocheted throughout Germany, Europe’s largest economy, with a benchmark survey released on Tuesday showing that economic sentiment dropped more than expected in October, to 1.9 points from 12.1 in September.“The emissions scandal at Volkswagen and sluggish growth in emerging markets are dampening the economic outlook for Germany,” the ZEW research institute, which conducts the monthly survey, said in a statement.Germany’s economy minister, Sigmar Gabriel, said on Tuesday that he felt confident the problems at Volkswagen, a source of more than 750,000 jobs in the country, would not inflict permanent damage on the national economy.Last week, Matthias Müller, Volkswagen’s new chief executive, said the automaker would require more than the €6.5 billion it had initially set aside to bring vehicles with illegal software into compliance with emissions standards, but he added that it was too soon to provide a new estimate.On Monday, Werner Hoyer, the head of the European Investment Bank, said the institution was checking to see whether Volkswagen had violated its agreements to uphold certain environmental goals.Speaking to the German daily Süddeutsche Zeitung, Mr. Hoyer said that he was “very disappointed” by Volkswagen’s actions and that the institute he leads would conduct “very thorough investigations” into how the automaker spent the estimated €4.6 billion it borrowed from the bank since 1990 for the development of engines with lower emissions.In case of impropriety, he said, the investment bank would consider demanding that the loans be repaid.BERLIN — A senior Volkswagen executive who was recently tapped to take over the company’s North American division is instead leaving the company after 25 years.In announcing the departure of the executive, Winfried Vahland, the company said Wednesday that he was leaving over a disagreement about how to structure the North American operations. The company specifically said that his departure had nothing to do with the diesel-emissions scandal that is preoccupying Volkswagen.But the development only adds to the turmoil at Volkswagen, which is the subject of investigations on both sides of the Atlantic, including inquiries by the United States Justice Department and state prosecutors from Lower Saxony in Germany.Mr. Vahland, who had been the chief of Volkswagen Group’s Skoda unit, was appointed on Sept. 25 to lead Volkswagen’s newly reorganized North America division. It was part of a shake-up that followed the resignation of Volkswagen’s chief executive, Martin Winterkorn, after the company admitted installing software designed to trick diesel air-quality tests and that was installed on 11 million vehicles worldwide.Several executives have been suspended in connection with Volkswagen’s investigation into the fraud, although the company has refused to release any details. On Wednesday, the company said that reports in the German news media that “several dozen” managers had been involved were inflated.Mr. Vahland had been expected to take up a position that would have placed overall responsibility for the automaker in the United States, Mexico and Canada in his hands. But because of “differing views on the organization” of the new division, “expressly not related to current events on the issue of diesel engines,” he decided to leave the company, a company statement said.Before taking over Skoda, which is based in the Czech Republic, Mr. Vahland served in various posts at Volkswagen. In 2005, he helped start a major expansion of Volkswagen in China, and he was considered one of the company’s most senior executives.In announcing the reorganization of its operations in North America last month, Volkswagen said that Mr. Vahland would “combine and significantly strengthen” the new North America division. Existing executives, including the company’s top executive in the United States, Michael Horn, would have remained in place, but they would have reported to him.DUBLIN — The Irish government, long criticized by other European countries and the United States for its friendly tax treatment of multinational giants like Apple and Google, on Tuesday announced a move that seemed likely to further incense its critics.Ireland, whose corporate tax rate of 12.5 percent is already one of the lowest in the developed world, said it would cut that rate in half for a new tax category — one covering revenue pegged to companies’ patents and other intellectual property.Companies that could be poised to benefit include Apple, Google, Facebook and Microsoft — all of which have significant operations in Ireland and have troves of intellectual property that might be eligible for the new tax treatment.Google and Facebook declined to comment on Tuesday, and Apple and Microsoft did not immediately respond to requests for comment.The new 6.25 percent rate would apply to a tax category that Ireland announced last year, which it calls a “knowledge development box,” and would be put into effect early next year. The category is meant to provide tax breaks for revenue and royalties derived from intellectual property held in a specific country.Other countries, including Britain, Luxembourg and the Netherlands, have created similar tax categories for intellectual property, often in the hope of enticing overseas companies to set up shop in their territories.But critics contend that the royalties paid on intellectual property under such arrangements often do not adequately reflect where the inventions were made or where the innovations generate the most revenue.Finance Minister Michael Noonan of Ireland, who announced the new plan on Tuesday, described the knowledge box and the low rate as a “significant enhancement” to Ireland’s corporate tax system.“This puts Ireland in the unique position to offer long-term certainty to industries planning their research and development investments,” he said. “The initiative adds a further dimension to our best-in-class corporation tax offerings.”James Stewart, an associate professor of finance at Trinity College, Dublin, said Ireland’s new approach would probably change the tax strategies of multinational companies — though not for the better.“This is complex, and multinationals love complexity,” he said, “because it allows them to develop tax avoidance strategies. The last thing they want is simplicity.”Over the last two decades, many American companies — tech giants like Facebook and Google, as well as nontech companies like the drugmaker Pfizer — have established sizable operations in Ireland, primarily to take advantage of the country’s low-tax tradition.Ireland’s corporate tax rates compare with a rate of 35 percent, before deductions, in the United States.But critics say the bigger issue lies in the special tax deals that Ireland made to entice multinational companies to set up operations there. Such deals have led to criticism from some global policy makers, who argue that companies are not paying enough tax.Ireland is by no means the only European country whose corporate tax strategies have come under scrutiny. The European Union has been investigating the tax arrangements between big multinational companies in Luxembourg and the Netherlands, among other places.For many lawmakers and regulators in the 28-nation European Union, particularly in the countries severely affected by the financial crisis, the ability of some companies to move a large share of their European revenue to low-tax member states like Ireland has been viewed as unfair competition and as an encouragement of tax-shopping by multinational corporations.As part of the region’s efforts to increase transparency over where companies pay tax, European officials agreed last week to force individual countries to provide information on preferential tax deals granted to international companies.Ireland’s new rules are meant to comply with that agreement while going even further, Mr. Noonan indicated. He said Ireland was becoming one of the first countries to adopt tax-disclosure and compliance guidelines detailed by the Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development, which represents 34 industrialized democracies.The idea, the Irish government said, is to let its tax officials have a fuller picture of companies that use Ireland as a tax base, to determine whether they are paying their share of corporate taxes in other jurisdictions. Ireland said it would share this confidential information with other countries where the companies operate.In adopting the new knowledge-box category, Ireland says it is trying to eliminate complicated tax structures that have included the so-called “Double Irish” tax provision. That provision, now being phased out, allowed companies with operations in Ireland to make royalty payments for intellectual property to a separate Irish-registered subsidiary. That unit, though incorporated in Ireland, typically had its home in a country that had no corporate income tax, reducing the amount each company had to pay on its Irish-based profits.Eamonn Walsh, an accounting professor at University College, Dublin, said the new approach by Ireland “should end some of the more egregious attempts to channel funds to zero-rate jurisdictions.”“Companies might decide to cut their losses,” he said, “and opt for the certainty of a 6.5 percent rate in Ireland.”Tax officials in the United States have criticized Ireland’s arrangements. But the issue is particularly sensitive in Europe, where many countries are still struggling. Tax experts say national governments are eager to tap into new sources of income, especially as many of the large American tech companies have continued to post record profits despite the recent global economic uncertainty.In countries including France, which is perceived by some industry executives as taking a harsh line against American tech companies, politicians have called on companies like Google to pay taxes on their local operations, instead of only in Ireland, where the company has its European headquarters.In response, tech companies typically say that they conform with the tax laws in every country where they operate.Yet, in a sign that some national lawmakers are starting to clamp down on companies’ often-complicated tax structures, countries are changing their local regulations to force companies to pay more tax.In Britain, for example, politicians recently passed a so-called Google Tax that requires companies to pay a certain level of tax on their operations there, even though their headquarters are elsewhere for tax purposes.And in May, Amazon, the e-commerce giant, announced that it would pay taxes in a number of European countries where it has large operations, instead of funneling nearly all of its sales through Luxembourg, which has comparatively low taxes.United States congressional investigators said in 2013 that Apple had created a web of international subsidiaries, some in Ireland, to move at least $74 billion from 2009 to 2012 beyond the reach of the Internal Revenue Service. Apple has denied wrongdoing and says that it pays appropriate levels of tax in the countries where it operates.The European Commission, the executive arm of the European Union, has been investigating whether the Irish government gave Apple illegal subsidies through a preferential tax settlement.The investigators, who are still conducting their inquiries, criticized Irish officials for giving Apple unlawful so-called state aid in the form of tax breaks. Such special deals, according to a 21-page report published last year, created unfair advantages for Ireland over other European countries. The Irish government may eventually be forced to collect back taxes from Apple.A separate investigation is looking at whether Luxembourg broke Europe’s tough state-aid rules by offering similar preferential treatment to Amazon, whose European headquarters are there.Yet while European Union officials have applauded these efforts, lawmakers in some countries, particularly those that have used low corporate taxes to entice global companies to their shores, have complained that they will not be able to compete against bigger countries if they cannot use tax incentives to attract new investment from international businesses.Ireland’s corporate tax rates may be low by international standards, but the revenue they generate is a major contributor to the country’s Treasury. In 2014, Ireland’s total tax take was 41 billion euros, or $46.6 billion, and corporate tax accounted for 11 percent of the total.Bank of Internet USA has become one of the country’s top-performing banks by churning out high-cost mortgages to wealthy individuals with complex finances.But in a federal lawsuit filed on Tuesday, a former internal auditor of the bank contended that Bank of Internet was cutting corners as it grew at a rapid pace.The auditor, Matt Erhart, said in the suit that he was fired after revealing what he believed to be wrongdoing at the bank to federal regulators and management at Bank of Internet. The complaint, filed in federal court in the Southern District of California, said that Bank of Internet violated federal laws that seek to protect whistle-blowers.“As a former federal prosecutor and long time employment lawyer, I find the bank’s conduct as alleged here to be among the most egregious I have seen from a publicly traded company,” Carol Gillam, Mr. Erhart’s lawyer, said in a statement.In an interview on Tuesday, Gregory Garrabrants, Bank of Internet’s chief executive, said the allegations were groundless. “The factual inaccuracies here are numerous and substantial,” he said. “Mr. Erhart has made all of these allegations in great detail to federal regulators, who have reviewed them in depth and have found them to be wholly without merit.”Mr. Garrabrants said that Bank of Internet was planning to file a separate legal action against Mr. Erhart that may assert that he abused the bank’s private information.Bank of Internet, which is based in San Diego and has nearly $6 billion in assets, is a standout performer at a time when other banks are growing slowly. The bank was the subject of a New York Times report in August that examined where the bank’s growth was coming from.The bank’s biggest business is making mortgages to high-net-worth individuals who need loans to help buy big-ticket properties because they do not have sufficient cash on hand. Critics of the bank say that Bank of Internet is not doing sufficiently thorough checks on borrowers, adding that many might be more indebted than the bank’s filings suggest.But Mr. Garrabrants fiercely defended Bank of Internet’s business. The bank’s loans, he said in an earlier interview, have large financial cushions to protect the bank if borrowers default.Mr. Erhart’s complaint seeks to paint a picture of a bank where controls often did not apply. It says that Bank of Internet’s borrowers may have included foreign nationals who might have been off-limits under federal anti-money-laundering laws. The suit does not, however, name any of the borrowers that Mr. Erhart thought suspicious. And in an earlier interview, Mr. Garrabrants said the bank had passed a regulatory review of its loans to foreign nationals.According to the complaint, Bank of Internet at times failed to provide full and timely information to regulators.The suit says that in January, Bank of Internet told its primary regulator, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, that none of its accounts lacked tax identification numbers. The complaint added, however, that Mr. Erhart, whose employment at the bank ended in June, saw a spreadsheet that contained as many as 200 accounts without tax identification numbers.According to the complaint, Bank of Internet was also not forthcoming with the Securities and Exchange Commission when the agency sought information about an account at the bank.Neither the office of the comptroller nor the S.E.C. responded on Tuesday to requests for comment.